<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891002-0019 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-02-89.f2.A1018</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 189 / Monday, October 2, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Coast Guard</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">46 CFR Parts 50, 56 and 61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[CGD 77-140]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2115-AA17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Vessel Piping Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency: </T2>Coast Guard, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary: </T2>These regulations amend the vessel piping systems regulationsto clarify technical requirements, correct errors, and revise the listsof acceptable standards and specifications. These changes result from advancesin technology and suggestions from industry and Coast Guard field unitsand provide a better understanding of the technical requirements for vesselpiping systems. In addition, these amendments delete the manufacturers'affidavit system used to verify compliance of various piping componentswith the regulations and, instead, incorporate industry developed standards.These changes eliminate the submission of technical information for thesecomponents and reduce the overall cost burden in staff hours and paperworkfor both industry and the Government, while providing a better method forensuring that the components comply with Coast Guard regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>dates: </T2>This rule is effective on November 1, 1989. The incorporationby reference of certain publications listed in the regulations is approvedby the Director of the Federal Register as of November 1, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact: </T2>Lieutenant Commander Peter Richardson,Office of Marine Safety, Security, and Environmental Protection; MarineTechnical and Hazardous Materials Division, (202) 267-2206.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information: </T2>On January 9, 1985, the Coast Guardpublished a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(50 FR 1072). The NPRM was entitled ``MiscellaneousChanges to parts 50 and 56,'' and 27 comments were received on the proposal.On May 18, 1988, the Coast Guard published a Supplemental Notice of ProposedRulemaking (SNPRM) entitled ``Vessel Piping Systems,'' in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 17868). The SNPRM expanded upon the earlierNPRM and further proposed deletion of the affidavit system whereby manufacturersverify compliance with regulations in the fabrication of vessel pipingsystem components. The Coast Guard received 8 comments in response to theSNPRM, bringing the total number of comments received on the proposal to35. A public hearing was not requested and one was not held.<ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information</ITAG>The principal persons involved in drafting this document are Mr. HowardL. Hime, Project Manager, and Mr. Stephen H. Barber and Lieutenant CommanderDon M. Wrye, Project Counsels, Office of Chief Counsel.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>These regulations clarify certain technical requirements for vessel pipingsystems in 46 CFR part 56, correct errors, and revise the lists of acceptablestandards and specifications. In addition, these regulations delete from46 CFR part 50 the manufacturers' affidavit system used to verify complianceof various piping components with the regulations and, instead, incorporatesindustry developed standards. These regulations have no effect on installationsand equipment already accepted by Coast Guard marine inspectors and maintainedin good and serviceable condition. However, when a piece of equipment ora system is replaced, these regulations (as well as other regulations issuedafter the original date of acceptance) which relate to the equipment orsystem would be applicable to the replacement.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments and Changes</ITAG>1. Section 50.25-1This section was revised by the SNPRM to describe the basic acceptancecriteria for materials and piping components.One comment requested clarification of the marking required by paragraphs(c) and (d). Paragraph (c) was revised to clarify that the marking is thatrequired by the adopted industry standard. Paragraph (d) and andSection;50.25-10,which are for components not complying with an industry standard, werenot changed since it is clear that the marking is that which is normallyapplied to the component by the manufacturer.2. Section 56.01-3One comment pointed out the section title is incorrect since there is nolonger a 102.4.7 in American National Standards Institute (ANSI) B31.1.The section title in the final rule has been revised to delete this reference.3. Section 56.01-6This section has been removed and all standards referenced in that sectionhave been incorporated into a new andSection;56.01-2. Regarding commentson the old andSection;56.01-6, one comment recommended the adoption of AmericanSociety for Testing and Materials (ASTM) F-25 and ASTM F-25.13 standards.Several standards developed under ASTM F-25 Committee on Shipbuilding Standardswere proposed for incorporation by reference under the SNPRM. The CoastGuard is actively involved with industry in the development of shipbuildingstandards through this committee, its subcommittees, and its task groups.The final rule incorporates many of these standards. As more standardsare developed and found to be suitable for incorporation into the regulations,they will be included by future rulemaking projects.4. Section 56.01-10A new paragraph (f) was added by the proposed rule which would have permittedthe substitution of a piping system diagram (required to be submitted byandSection;56.01-10(c)(1)) which contained locations where required and afully detailed material list in lieu of an arrangement drawing (as requiredby andSection;56.01-10(c)(2)) unless calculations were also required forthat system.Three comments questioned the requirement in paragraph (f)(2) for ``a fullydetailed bill of material.'' One stated the requirement should be deletedsince the presently permitted diagram material schedule is sufficient.One felt the wording needed clarification. One indicated the wording wasmisleading and would be incompatible with the efforts of the National ShipbuildingStandards Program (Panel SP-6) to develop a standardized method of describingpipe and piping system components on piping diagrams. The introductorysentence to paragraph (f) of the final rule has been changed to clarifythat this paragraph provides an alternative to submitting the arrangementdrawings of andSection;56.01-10(c)(2). Paragraph (f)(2) has been rewordedto ensure that piping diagrams contain sufficient information to enableplan reviewers to substantiate that components comply with applicable regulations,while at the same time be compatible with the efforts of Panel SP-6 ofthe National Shipbuilding Standards.5. Section 56.04-10This section was changed by the proposed rule to clarify the acceptancecriteria for piping systems which do not require specific plan approval.One comment indicated that a statement should be included in this sectionto indicate that pressure vessels would have to meet part 54 as applicable.This recommendation has not been incorporated. Pressure vessels are notconsidered appurtenances and are not covered by this section. It is unnecessaryto indicate that pressure vessels must meet part 54, as applicable.One comment said paragraph (c) should specify ``operational'' failures,since failure in any pressurized system could constitute a hazard to personnel.This recommendation has not been incorporated. The wording has been unchangedin the final rule. This paragraph allows the inspector to evaluate systemsand consider many parameters (e.g., proximity to switchboards, locationsrelative to personnel access routes, the dependence of vital systems uponthem, etc.) in determining whether they are inherently safe and suitablefor the environment in which they are installed.6. Section 56.07-5This section was amended by the addition of a definition for ``vital system.''Two comments said the definition was itself subject to broad interpretationand did little to clarify the intent of the term. This definition has beenchanged to coincide with the definition for ``vital system or equipment''found in andSection;62.10 of this subchapter. This change was made to promoteuniformity in the regulations and clarify the intent behind this definition.7. Section 56.07-10Paragraph (c) of this section was revised by the proposed rulemaking toclarify that it replaced only paragraph 101.5.3 of ANSI B31.1, which dealswith considerations to account for earthquake effects, with requirementswhich relate specifically to ship motion dynamic effects.One comment questioned the requirement of paragraph (c)(2) of reducingtabulated allowable stress values by at least 20% when a ship motion analysisis not conducted for Class I systems. The comment stated that since thesystem would not be operated while the ship was in motion, no dynamic shipmotion analysis should be required and no reduction in specified allowablestresses would be necessary. This paragraph is unchanged in the final rule.The proposed wording is clear in specifying when allowable stress valuesmust be reduced. If vessel owners feel they have extenuating circumstanceswhich warrant a relaxation of this requirement, they may seek an approvalof their system on a case-by-case basis from the Marine Safety Center.One comment said that paragraph (d)(1) should reference 102.2.2 of ANSIB31.1 instead of 102.2. This recommendation has been included in the finalrule.8. Section 56.15-1Paragraph (a) of this section was amended by the proposed rules to clarifythe fact that materials used in the fabrication of pipe joining fittingsmanufactured in accordance with standards referenced in these regulationsmust comply with subpart 56.60 of this part.One comment said that requiring a component's material to meet Subpart56.60 when it complied with a referenced standard was unjustified. Thecomment stated that any material specified within an adopted standard shouldbe acceptable for use. This paragraph was revised by the SNPRM and thewording in question has been left unchanged in the final rule. Componentmaterials must meet the requirements of subpart 56.60, since these havebeen found to be specifically suitable for shipboard applications. Whilereferenced standards ensure components of acceptable pressure/temperaturedesigns, some materials accepted in those standards may be unsuitable forthe marine environment.9. Section 56.20-1This section was amended by the proposed rules to clarify wording thathas been a frequent cause of confusion. Additionally, the SNPRM deletedreference to the affidavit system, instructed manufacturers how to obtainacceptance of their products, permitted, with some limitations, the useof welded valves, and incorporated into the regulations additional currentindustry standards for valves.Three comments were received in response to the initial proposed rules.One stated the valve specification should be broadened to include modernvalve designs not currently acceptable. The SNPRM accomplished this withits proposed method for manufacturers to gain product acceptance of valvesnot built to referenced standards. These procedures are included in thefinal rule.One comment indicated that clarification was needed as to what constitutesa ``welded valve.'' The SNPRM expands upon the present working of the regulationsand clarifies that the procedures of subpart 56.70 and part 57 must befollowed for welded valves. These requirements are applicable to weldswhich form part of the pressure-containing boundary of the valve (i.e.,body, bonnet).10. Section 56.20-9This section was revised by the proposed rules for clarification purposesand to limit the use of wafer valves to agree with the American Bureauof Shipping (ABS) Rules for Building and Classing Steel Vessels and allowpiping inboard of a skin valve to be removed without drydocking the vessel.Three comments indicated questions remained with the revised wording ofparagraph (a). They also all uged that quarter-turn (rotary) valves bepermitted in addition to outside yoke and screw valves with rising-stem.The attempt to clarify the requirements of this section obviously led tofurther confusion. Quarter-turn (rotary) valves have long been acceptedaboard Coast Guard inspected and certificated vessels. Numerous standardsreferenced in Table 56.60-1 (b) relate to this type of valve. Paragraphs(e) and (f) of this section specifically address plug cocks. Section 56.20-15addresses resiliently seated valves, traditionally quarter-turn valves.The fact that three commenters said such valves should be permited indicatesstill further clarification of this section is necessary. Therefore, requirementshave been added for quarter-turn and lever operated valves.Four comments indicated that further clarification of paragraph (b) wasnecessary, while one commenter felt that the paragraph was overly restrictiveon the size limitation for socket type welding ends for class I pipingsystems. These comments are agreed with. The size restrictions have beenchanged to agree with other socket weld restrictions in the regulationsand the ABS Rules for Building and Classing Steel Vessels, which also clarifiesthe requirements of this paragraph.One comment requested further clarification of the allowable use of wafer-typevalves for shell connections in paragraph (c). This recommendation hasbeen incorporated in the final rule. The intent behind not allowing wafer-typevalves as shell connection shut-off valves is that many wafer valves areheld in place by the pressure exerted by adjacent piping flanges. Theydo not permit piping immediately inboard of the valve to be removed forrepair without raising the shell connection out of the water. This is notin keeping with good marine practice. Therefore, this paragraph has beenrevised to clarify this point.11. Section 56.20-15A new paragraph (c) was added by the proposed rule which clarified therequirements of resiliently seated valves. It specified how manufacturersare to qualify their valves to desired categorization.One comment pointed out that the valve categorization specified in paragraph(b) did not coincide with the valve categorization criteria of paragraph(a). This comment is agreed with. The first sentence of paragraph (b) hasbeen revised to include positive shutoff valves as a third category ofresiliently seated valves.Several comments were received which related to paragraph (c). Three indicatedthat actual fire testing provided the most meaningful results and shouldbe used to determine Category A and positive shutoff designations. Fourquestioned the formulas used to determine leakage rates for the variouscategorizations, claiming they were unclear or incapable of being met.None of the comments made were incorporated. Being a new requirement, confusionwas anticipated. These tests were included in the regulations to providedefinite limits to be used in categorizing resiliently seated valves. Testinga valve by removing the resilient seating material affords manufacturersa way to avoid bearing the cost of fire testing their product. It is asimple matter to determine the flow through a valve at its rated pressureand comparing it against the flow through the valve closed with the resilientseating material removed and subjected to the same pressure. For thosemanufacturers who choose not to utilize this option, they may conduct afire test of their valve or submit calculations verifying their productacceptance, provided the alternate method chosen is acceptable to the Commandant(G-MTH).12. Section 56.25-20The SNPRM modified this section to bring its wording into line with thatcontained in ANSI B31.1. One commenter felt that paragraph (b) of thissection should be further revised to more fully comply with ANSI B16.5.Specifically, carbon steel bolts should be permitted to have either hexheads or square heads, and the maximum operating temperature for low strengthcarbon steel bolts should be reduced to 400 anddegrees;F. The final rulereduces the maximum operating temperature allowed for low strength carbonsteel bolts to 400 anddegrees;F. This is in agreement with ANSI B16.5 andANSI B31.1. The requirement that carbon steel bolts have heavy hexagonsteel heads and nuts has been retained. Though this exceeds the requirementsof ANSI B16.5, it complies with the requirements of ANSI B31.1 and retainsthe requirements presently contained within these regulations.Two comments pointed out that paragraph (c), in prohibiting the use ofheaded alloy bolts, conflicts with ANSI B16.5 and ANSI B31.1. The finalrule eliminates this prohibition. It additionally leaves the wording ofthe first sentence of paragraph (d) unchanged. This change brings the regulatoryrequirement into line with long adopted codes and standards.One comment indicated that Class 3 threads have been the standard usedby all manufacturers and felt that paragraph (d) should be revised to reflectthis fact. This comment has not been included in the final rule. The presentwording permits Class 3 threads as well as others and agrees with the requirementsof ANSI B16.5, ANSI B31.1 and the ASME Code. No change is warranted. TheCoast Guard sees no reason to restrict the choice to only one class ofthreads.13. Section 56.30-5The SNPRM proposed revisions to several of the requirements for weldedjoints outlined in this section.One comment pointed out that, in paragraph (c), the references to subparagraphsandSection; 56.30-10(b) (5) and (6) should be deleted from the first sentenceof this paragraph since they are not applicable to socket welds. This suggestionhas been included in the final rule.Two comments were made regarding paragraphs (c) and (d), questioning whythe requirement for a fillet weld leg size of 1.4 times the nominal pipewall thickness (1.4T) has been retained when ANSI B31.1 has permitted thisdimension to be reduced to 1.09T. The final rule has not been changed.A fillet weld leg size of 1.4T results in a fillet weld throat thicknessequal to the nominal pipe wall thickness. The NPRM discussed the recenttrend of reducing fillet weld leg size to 1.09T. The reduction in filletweld size was permitted primarily for socket type pipe joints and socketweld fittings where the surface of the parts to be joined did not alwaysallow for larger fillets. However, many experts do not consider this reductionappropriate for fillet welds which effectively serve as all or part ofthe hub area of a flange to a pipe joint. Our regulations already containprovisions to reduce the fillet size in Class II piping and when heavywall pipe is used for long life in corrosive service rather than for strength.For these reasons we decided not to change our requirements for filletweld size except to include a provision that the fillet weld need not belarger than the space available for it on the hub of the flange. No data,as specifically requested by the NPRM, was submitted to prove the 1.4Trequirement is overly conservative. Therefore, the change to 1.09T willnot be made.14. Section 56.30-10The SNPRM proposed revisions to several of the requirements for flangedjoints outlined in this section.Two comments were made about the proposed sentence added to the note toFigure 56.30-10(b). Both pointed out referencing a hub thickness of \1/8\-inchis meaningless since all ANSI hubs have a thickness larger than this. Thesecomments are agreed with. The note has been changed accordingly.Two comments stated that in paragraph (b)(2), the size of the strengthfillet welds for slip-on type flanges should be changed to coincide withANSI B31.1, i.e., permit a leg length of 1.09 times the nominal pipe thickness.This suggestion has not been included in the final rule for the reasonsdiscussed above.One comment objected to the proposed wording of paragraph (b)(3) sinceit limits the use of slip-on flanges to a maximum nominal pipe size (NPS)of 4 for all Class I piping systems whereas the existing rules permit theiruse in sizes exceeding 4 NPS in relatively low pressure Class I systems.The final rule is as proposed. The changes to this section and andSection;56.95-10 are made to bring regulatory requirements into agreement withANSI B31.1 and correct long-standing printing errors in 46 CFR Table 56.95-10.One comment stated that paragraph (b)(5) should be modified to allow hubbedplate flanges in accordance with appendix 2 of section VIII of the ASMECode. This suggestion has not been included in the final rule. Hubbed plateflanges are currently permitted by andSection; 56.25-5 which allows flangesto meet the design requirements of appendix 2 of section VIII of the ASMECode. Paragraph (b)(5) is intended only to address flat plate flanges andmodifying this paragraph to include hubbed plate flanges is unnecessary.15. Section 56.30-20 One comment stated paragraph (c) of this section, regarding restrictionson threaded joints, is too vague but offered no suggestions for clarification.The wording of this paragraph has been unchanged in the final rule. Therule is sufficiently specific to allow designers and plan reviewers todetermine where threaded joints are not permitted. 16. Section 56.35-15 The NPRM attempted to clarify and differentiate the requirements for metallicand nonmetallic expansion joints. Four comments indicated confusion still exists and recommended the CoastGuard recognize the standards of the Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association(EJMA). This suggestion was incorporated. The SNPRM revised this sectionand andSection; 56.35-10. Section 56.35-10 now contains requirements fornonmetallic expansion joints (regardless of their pressure rating) andandSection; 56.35-15 contains requirements for metallic expansion joints.Standards of the EJMA have been added to Table 56.60-1(b) as applicableto piping systems. Expansion joints meeting adopted standards will be suitablefor use within their design pressure/temperature ratings. Those not builtto recognized standards must be proven suitable on a case-by-case basisin accordance with andSection; 50.25 of this chaper. 17. Section 56.50-1 Paragraph (c) of this section was amended by including the fact that modernsluicing arrangements for tankships would be considered for approval ona case-by-case basis by the Marine Safety Center. One comment stated that the use of sluicing systems should be allowed onvessels other than tankships. This comment has not been included in thefinal rules. Sluicing arrangements are only suitable for vessels dedicatedto the carriage of liquid cargoes, i.e., tankships. Should, at some futuredate, another vessel designer propose such a system, it may be consideredfor acceptance under the ``general equivalency'' regulations of 46 CFR50.20-30. One comment suggested that paragraph (g)(2) be amended to include a requirementthat valve position indicating systems be independent of the valve controlsystems. This suggestion has been incorporated into the final rules. Vesselpersonnel must know the status of remotely operated valves from the positionof the remote valve control. The position indicating system should be independentof the control system in order that failure of the latter will not resultin failure of the former. Paragraph (g)(2)(iii) has been amended by theaddition of the requirement that valve position indicator systems be independentof the valve control systems. This is consistent with the requirement containedin andSection; 62.30-5 of this subchapter. One comment suggested that paragraph (g)(3) be revised to clarify its intent.This recommendation has been included in the final rule. Paragraph (g)(3)has been revised to clarify that the required self-indicating air cockin the actuating line to an air operated remote control valve must indicatethe desired valve position, i.e., open or closed. The independent valveposition indicator, required by amended paragraph (g)(2)(iii), serves toverify that the actual valve position coincides with the desired valveposition. 18. Section 56.50-15 One comment pointed out that the steam heating requirements of paragraph(h) of this section should be amended to bring the regulatory requirementsinto line with accepted shipboard practices. This comment is agreed with.The present regulations limit steam pressure for ``space heating'' to 45pounds per square inch gage (psig). The question has frequently been askedas to the meaning of ``space heating.'' Space heating has been interpretedto mean heating for accommodation and public spaces. Non-accommodationand non-public spaces (e.g., work spaces, machinery spaces, gear lockers)are permitted to have steam heating systems in excess of 45 psig. Paragraph(h) of this section has been revised to clarify this policy. 19. Section 56.50-45 The NPRM proposed that paragraph (b) of this section be modified by specifyingthat the suctions for the main and emergency circulating pumps be ``wellseparated'' in addition to independent. Two comments pointed out that the proposed change was vague and open tosignificant variations in interpretation. These comments are agreed with,and the proposed change has been deleted from the final rule. 20. Section 56.50-50 The proposed rules amended paragraph (c) of this section to inform designersthat bilge systems other than the conventional manifold-type may be consideredon a case-by-case basis by the Marine Safety Center, and to require bilgedischarge valves to comply with the rapid operation requirements currentlyimposed upon suction valves. One comment stated the requirements for common rail-type systems shouldbe clearly specified and moved to a separate section. This suggestion hasnot been incorporated into the final rule. The present regulations adequatelyaddress common rail-type bilge systems, and the amendments to this paragraphpermit any nonmanifold-type bilge system to be evaluated on a case-by-casebasis. Two comments indicated that the proposed wording could be interpreted torequire stop-check manifold type valves for bilge overboard discharges.This point is agreed with. The intent of the proposed rule was that bilgeoverboard discharge valves comply with the location and accessibility requirementsof the bilge suction valves, but the proposed rules did not intend thatbilge overboard discharge valves be of the stop-check type. Therefore,the fourth sentence has been modified to indicate that bilge overboarddischarge valves must meet the location and accessibility requirementsof the suction manifolds. The proposed rules amended paragraph (d)(1) of this section to correcta long-standing typographical error in the formula used to determine thediameter of the suction to each main bilge pump. Five comments pointed out that the proposed rule was still incorrect. Thisobservation is agreed with. The improper fix was a result of a misprint.The formula is correct in the final rule. Paragraph (f)(3) of this section was amended by the proposed rules to clarifythe emergency bilge suction requirements of paragraph (f). One comment was made which pointed out that the proposed amendment didnot accomplish its goal. This comment is agreed with. The existing textof paragraph (f)(3) will be left unchanged. Instead, the word ``except''will be deleted from the first sentence of the introductory text of paragraph(f). This word is the apparent cause of the confusion over this requirement.By this deletion, vessel designers should have no problem determining whena vessel is required to have an emergency bilge suction. It should be notedthat vessels engaged solely in river service are not required to have anemergency bilge suction. The requirements for emergency bilge suctionsstem from the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea 1974,as amended (SOLAS 74/83), which is not applicable to these vessels. Additionally,the purpose of an emergency bilge suction is to ``buy time'' in the eventof catastrophic flooding. Vessels in river service, unlike vessels withocean, coastwise or Great Lakes routes, are usually closer to the safetyof shore. The NPRM proposed incorporating piping separation requirements containedin various locations within 33 CFR and 46 CFR into paragraph (h) of thissection. Several comments were made in response to this proposal. These pointedout that the requirements went beyond bilge and ballast piping to whichandSection; 56.50-50 pertains, that this paragraph should be referenced inother sections, and the imposition of requirements for spaces which couldcontain Grade E liquids (with flashpoints below 150anddegrees;F) will causeproblems with diesel propelled vessels (since diesel flashpoints are at140anddegrees;F). These comments are agreed with, and the proposed changehas been deleted. To clarify the ambiguity in the present text, wordinghas been added to indicate that these bilge piping requirements are intendedto apply to drain spaces containing dry cargo (i.e., cargo holds). Thefirst sentence of this paragraph specifies ``cargo holds'' instead of ``cargospaces.'' The NPRM proposed modifying paragraph (k) of this section by making therequirements applicable to all tanks through which bilge and ballast pipingpass rather than just deep tanks, with the specific exception of ballastpiping passing through ballast tanks. Three comments were received that related to this proposed change. Onecomment stated that the wording was still unclear and proposed alternatewording. Two comments stated that the restrictions were excessive and proposedallowing the use of expansion joints and dresser-type couplings in bilgeand ballast lines within tanks. As a result of these comments, this paragraphwas modified by the SNPRM. The requirements still apply to all tanks, ratherthan just deep tanks, with the exception of ballast piping passing throughballast tanks. In addition, alternates to welded pipe or enclosing pipingin pipe tunnels (such as expansion joints or dresser-type couplings) couldbe approved by the Marine Safety Center, provided certain design verificationsare submitted and found to be satisfactory. 21. Section 56.50-55 Three comments indicated that clarification was needed in paragraph (c)with respect to the requirement of a suction velocity of not less than400 feet per minute through the bilge suction pipe. This requirement wasincluded in the SNPRM and has been retained in the final rule. The questionhas been frequently raised as to whether or not this suction velocity wasrequired in suction piping larger than that required by andSection; 56.50-50of this part. This would require builders to install pumps larger thanthat required if the minimum pipe size were provided. The intent of the regulations regarding bilge suction velocity is to ensurethat a given volume of water can be removed in a given time. The larger(or deeper) the compartment, the larger the required volumetric flow rate.Minimum pipe sizes are specified in the regulations. Since volumetric flowrate is the prime concern, if a designer opts to install larger than requiredpiping, a pump may be installed which will produce a lesser fluid velocitythrough that pipe, provided the volume of fluid removed in a given timewill at least equal that amount passing through the minimum required pipesize at 400 feet per minute. Paragraph (e)(1) of this section was modified by the proposed rules toclarify the intent of the separation of bilge pump requirements and toprovide an example of an acceptable alternative bilge pump arrangement.Two comments interpreted the example to be a required pumping arrangementand took exception. Though the example was provided to illustrate one acceptablealternative pumping arrangement, rather than a required alternative, itis clear that the proposed wording could lead to confusion. To remedy thisproblem, the example has been deleted from the final rule. Ideally, bilgepumps should be located in separate watertight compartments. In vesselswhich do not have separate watertight compartments, or in which it is notpracticable to locate bilge pumps in separate watertight compartments,designers may propose alternative arrangements (i.e., locating all bilgepumps within the machinery space) for consideration by the Marine SafetyCenter. 22. Section 56.50-60 The NPRM combined the requirements of andSection; 56.50-5 with the requirementsof this section and changed the title of this section to read: ``Systemscontaining oil.'' Three comments pointed out the new title would lead readers to believethe requirements also apply to lube oil, hydraulic oil, and thermal fluidsystems. The Coast Guard agrees with these comments since this was theintent of the combination as stated in the NPRM. Unless otherwise specified,the requirements apply to all oil systems. Therefore, the proposed sectionheading is retained. One comment suggested that the first sentence of paragraph (c) of thissection be reworded for the sake of clarification. This has been done inthe final rule by revising the first sentence to remove redundant language.Three comments requested that paragraph (d) of this section be expandedto address acceptable valve types in specific locations (i.e., CategoryA valves at tanks with positive shutoff valves at the machinery space bulkhead),clarify the energy storage requirements for power operated valves, andclarify the design requirements for the power actuators for power operatedvalves. Paragraph (3)(i) of this section was revised by the SNPRM to clarifythat the energy storage requirements are applicable only to valves actuatedby hydraulic or pneumatic power. The Coast Guard reviewed the present requirementsfor valves at tanks and the design requirements for valve power operatorsand found the requirements adequate. Therefore, these requirements havenot been changed in the final rule. 23. Section 56.50-75 This section was modified by the NPRM with minor editorial corrections.One comment stated further revisions were necessary to address the useof heated fuel oil systems. The comment has not been included in the finalrule. The present regulations of this section, coupled with fuel systemand general requirements found elsewhere in this subchapter (e.g., andSection;andSection;56.01-1, 56.50-60, 58.01-5, etc.) are considered at this time to be adequate.24. Section 56.50-85 Paragraph (a) of this section was modified by the NPRM to clarify thatthe venting requirements specified applied to independent fixed non-pressuretanks or containers as well as to integral tanks. Paragraph (a)(4) of thissection was revised by the SNPRM to require all tank vents to extend abovethe weather deck, with certain specified exceptions. One comment stated that the venting requirements for cofferdams, voids,duct keels, etc., should also be included. This comment has not been includedin the final rule. These requirements are intended to apply to liquid-carryingtanks. Venting requirements for other spaces are found in other, more appropriate,places within the regulations. One comment questioned the fact that paragraph (a)(7) of this section addressesflame screens on bilge slop and contaminated drain tank vents, but neglectsto specify where such vents should terminate. This concern was addressedin the SNPRM and has been included in the final rule. Paragraph (a)(7)was redesignated as (a)(8) in the final rule. Paragraph (a)(4) of thissection now contains requirements for the terminus of tank vents dependentupon the fluid within the tank. Two comments felt the proposed regulations were too lax. Allowing bilgeoily-water holding tanks and bilge slop tanks to vent into the machineryspace is, they indicate, an unsafe practice. These comments are not agreedwith. Bilge oily-water holding tanks and bilge slop tanks contain oil/watermixtures from the machinery space bilge. Present regulations permit ventingof these tanks within the machinery space. The Coast Guard is unaware ofany problems that indicate this practice is unsafe. The danger of lighter,more volatile, vapors being concentrated within such tanks is minimizedsince they largely separate from the oil as it accumulates in the bilgeand are exhausted to atmosphere through the ventilation system. Additionally,vents from these tanks are required to be fitted with flame screens. Thisproposed regulation clarified present regulations, agrees with presentpolicy, and is in agreement with classification society requirements. 25. Section 56.50-95 This section was amended by the NPRM to clarify existing wording, addresstank overflows used as tank vents, and establish requirements for lockingof sea valves. One comment proposed amending paragraph (a)(1) of this section to indicatethat valves required by this section should be as close to the hull penetrationas practicable. This comment is agreed with and is included in the finalrule. One comment stated that paragraph (b)(1) of this section should be furthermodified to clarify that it applies only to discharges above the waterline.This comment has not been incorporated. The requirements are sufficientlyclear and have caused no confusion in the past. In their present form theyare virtually identical to the requirements found in the Load Line Regulations(46 CFR 42.15-60(c)) and various classification society rules (e.g., ABSRules, 36.25-2). One comment stated the intent behind the proposed change to paragraph (c)of this section was unclear because the term ``storage tank'' is not defined.This comment is agreed with. The final rules have been changed to eliminatethe term ``storage tank'' from the second sentence. Additional, the fourthsentence has been rewritten to clearly indicate that overflow pipes whichalso serve as tank vents must not be fitted with positive shutoff valves.26. Section 56.60-1 The section heading and the note to the heading of Table 56.60-1(a) ofthis section were amended by the SNPRM to clarify that Table 50.60-1(a)actually replaces Table 126.1 in ANSI B31.1. One comment stated that ``eliminating Table 126.1'' reduced the choiceof allowable materials. It is precisely because of such misunderstandingsthat the wording in the heading has been changed. As stated in paragraph(a)(1) of this section, the material requirements in this subpart mustbe used in lieu of those in ANSI B31.1. Table 56.60-1(a) is a list of onlythose materials currently listed in Table 126.1 of ANSI B31.1 that areacceptable. If all the materials in Table 126.1 were acceptable, therewould be no need for Table 56.60-1(a). The choice of allowable materialsis not narrowed; it is the same as it was before. The proposed change hasbeen retained in the final rule. The SNPRM incorporated additional industry standards, in large part inconjunction with the deletion of the affidavit system. Standards will continueto be adopted as they are found suitable. This section was further amendedby the NPRM and SNPRM to clarify wording, incorporate additional acceptablematerial standards into the regulations, and delete those which have beendiscontinued or found to be unsuitable for shipboard applications. Sixteen comments suggested additional standards to be incorporated by reference.The suggested standards were reviewed. Several were found to be alreadyincorporated by reference into the regulations. Others were found to besuitable and have been included in the final rule. Of those standards notadopted, some were found to have an unsuitable design factor of safety,lacked adequate testing criteria, or had no marking requirements. The CoastGuard is constantly looking for standards to adopt so as to reduce theregulatory burden on industry. However, certain key elements must be includedin a marine engineering standard before it will be incorporated by reference.These elements include: Acceptable materials of construction, adequatedesign criteria, quality assurance during fabrication, final product testing,manufacturer's certification, and product marking to indicate conformanceto the standard. Members of standards developing committees are stronglyencouraged to include these criteria in their standards, thereby enablingthem to be incorporated by reference into these regulations. Interestedpersons are strongly encouraged to continue to suggest standards for incorporationin these regulations. 27. Section 56.60-2 One comment stated that the restriction in footnote 5 of Table 56.60-2(a)of this section prohibiting certain brass materials from being used insalt water systems should be eliminated. This comment has not been includedin the final rule. However, the second sentence of footnote 5 has beenrevised to explain the intent behind this restriction. The brass materialsaffected by this footnote all have high concentrations of zinc, and aresubject to dezincification when used in a salt water environment. Copper-zincalloys containing more than 15% zinc are susceptable to this dealloyingprocess which weakens the alley and allows the leakage of liquids or gassesthrough the remaining porous mass. Most of the aluminum alloys affectedby this footnote have greater than 0.6% copper and are susceptable to stresscorrosion cracking unless they are solution heat treated and either naturallyaged or subjected to a precipitation heat treated temper. 28. Section 56.60-10 One comment questioned whether cast iron and malleable iron conformingto standards and specifications other than those listed in Tables 56.60-1(a)and 56.60-1(b) of this part are restricted to a maximum temperature limitationof 450anddegrees;F. The 450anddegrees;F temperature limitation applies to allcomponents made from cast iron or malleable iron. Section 56.60-10(a) hasbeen changed to clarify this requirement. 29. Section 56.60-15 Two comments pointed out that Appendix E no longer exists in ANSI B31.1.This comment is agreed with. This section was revised by the SNPRM. Referenceto Appendix E has been deleted. 30. Section 56.60-20Paragraph (a)(1) of this section was amended by the NPRM to address thelow melting points of other nonferrous materials instead of just aluminumand aluminum alloys.Two comments indicated the proposed wording was vague, especially withrespect to silver brazing alloys. These comments are not agreed with. Theintent of this section has not been changed. Instead it has been clarifiedby pointing out that the low melting point of all nonferrous materials,not only aluminum and aluminum alloys, must be considered in certain pipingapplications. Requirements relating to melting points of brazing materialsare contained elsewhere in the regulations.31. Section 56.60-25Modifications and amendments to this section were proposed by both theNPRM and SNPRM. In addition to correcting grammatical errors in the text,burning rates for glass reinforced resins and other plastics were specified,and specific test criteria for nonmetallic hoses were given.One comment questioned the deletion of the word ``valve'' from the firstsentence of paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section. This deletion was unintentional,and the word has been retained in the final rule.Five comments requested that reinforced thermosetting resin pipe (RTRP)be given wider acceptance in the regulations, including a relaxing of thepresent prohibitions placed upon the material when passing through bulkheadsand being installed in concealed spaces. This suggestion has not been includedin the final rule. The Coast Guard has been actively involved in studyingRTRP for use aboard inspected and certificated vessels. In September of1986, Navigation and Vessel Inspection Circular NVIC 11-86, ``GuidelinesGoverning the Use of Fiberglass Pipe (FGP) on Coast Guard Inspected Vessels''was issued. It provided the marine industry with updated guidance regardingthe application of FGP aboard vessels. Through this NVIC, the acceptedapplications of FGP were greatly expanded. Coast Guard personnel have beenworking closely with industry to develop consensus-type standards for FGPthrough ASTM's Committee F-25 on Shipbuilding. One of these standards,ASTM F1173, has been completed and is incorporated by reference into theseregulations. Internationally, the Coast Guard is leading in the developmentof acceptance criteria for all piping materials other than steel, whichincludes FGP, in all shipboard systems. For FGP, the requested regulatorychange will be addressed in a separate regulatory action.Two comments indicated that the burning rate to determine a self-extinguishingflammability criteria has been deleted from ASTM D635. This comment isagreed with. The SNPRM amended this paragraph to specify an acceptableburning rate. This has been included in the final rule.Numerous comments responded to the proposed changes to paragraph (c) ofthis section. Comments to the changes were favorable. Most comments wantedthe changes to go further, expanding the permitted reinforcing materials,allowing reuse of field attachable fittings, and modifying various testrequirements. The final rule is changed only to the extent proposed bythe NPRM and SNPRM. Currently the Rubber Manufacturers Association (RMA)and the Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE) are working together to developan industry standard for hoses intended for marine applications. Accordingly,no changes are anticipated to this paragraph until this effort is finalized.At that time, it is anticipated that the standard can be incorporated byreference, thereby negating the necessity to develop additional regulations.32. Section 56.97-5One comment indicated the term ``scuppers'' should be replaced with ``scuppervalves'' since the former is used to describe a deck drain fitting whichis not normally a part of a pressure piping system. Though the commentwas correct in describing a scupper, the suggestion has not been includedin the final rule. Valve tests are described in other portions of the subchapterand need not be repeated here. It is more appropriate to delete the word``scuppers'' from this section. This has been done in the final rule.33. Section 61.15-12This new section was added by the SNPRM to detail requirements for theinspection and replacement of nonmetallic expansion joints. Although nota comment on the regulations, the National Transportation Safety Board(NTSB) recommended in their marine accident reports on the Prince WilliamSound (NTSB/MAR-87/07) and the Ogden Willamette (NTSB/MAR-83/06) that theCoast Guard require a complete internal and external examination of nonmetallicexpansion joints installed in the main seawater circulating system duringdrydock inspections. This rulemaking requires external inspection of allnonmetallic expansion joints at each drydock inspection. Only if the externalinspection indicates the need for additional examination would the fittingbe required to be removed for internal inspection. Removal of expansionjoints to facilitate routine internal examinations, when no defects aresuspected, may not only be cost-prohibitive, but would increase the likelihoodof inadvertent damage. In addition and in accordance with the NTSB recommendationin the same reports, nonmetallic expansion joints in piping systems whichpenetrate a vessel's side, where both the expansion joint and the hullpenetration are below the deepest load waterline, would be required tobe replaced ten years after their date of manufacture.One comment pointed out that the proposed wording of paragraph (d) of thissection did not differentiate between metallic and nonmetallic expansionjoints, nor did it differentiate between specific piping systems. Thiscomment partially is agreed with. In the final rule, the section titlehas been changed to ``Nonmetallic expansion joints'' and paragraph (a)of this section has been revised to specifically require inspection ofnonmetallic expansion joints. The final rule continues to apply to anypiping system which penetrates the hull where both the penetration andthe nonmetallic expansion joint are below the deepest load waterline.One comment stated the required ten year replacement interval, as specifiedin paragraph (b) of this section, is unjustified. The comment maintainedthat with proper installation, and long-term care, nonmetallic expansionjoints can last the life of a vessel. The comment also stated that if areplacement interval was to be required, it should be tied to the dateof installation, not the date of manufacture of the joint. Another commentrequested that nonmetallic expansion joints on Great Lakes and other freshwatervessels be excluded from the ten year replacement interval. While somenonmetallic expansion joints do last the life of a vessel, many do not.Flooding as a result of failure of large nonmetallic joints in seawaterand freshwater systems can have catastrophic results. Basing replacementintervals on dates of installation ignores the natural deterioration whichoccurs to the organic materials used to fabricate nonmetallic expansionjoints. Despite the fact that joints may be ``properly maintained,'' thisdeterioration cannot be avoided. Also, since large joints are not normallykept in a vessel's spare parts inventory, the date of installation of ajoint should be close to its date of manufacture. The final rule retainsthe ten year replacement interval, based on date of manufacture. However,words have been added which gives the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspectionauthority to grant an extension of the ten year replacement requirementto coincide with the vessel's next required drydocking.<ITAG tagnum="84">Incorporation by Reference</ITAG>The material in subpart 50.15 and andSection; 56.01-2 has been approved forincorporation by reference by the Director of the Federal Register under5 U.S.C. 552 and 1 CFR part 51. The material is available as indicatedin andSection; 56.01-2.If substantive changes are made by the publisher to the materials incorporated,those changes may be considered for incorporation.However, before taking final action, the Coast Guard will publish a separatenotice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>for public comment.<ITAG tagnum="84">E.O. 12291 and DOT Regulatory Policies and Procedures</ITAG>These regulations are considered to be non-major under Executive Order12291 and nonsignificant under Department of Transportation regulatorypolicies and procedures (44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979). A final evaluationhas been prepared and placed in the public docket.Two major issues in these regulations are the deletion of the affidavitsystem and the addition of the requirement to periodically replace certainnonmetallic expansion joints. A study conducted in 1980 concluded thatthe deletion of the affidavit system would result in an estimated annualsavings in excess of $70,000 for the Coast Guard and $500,000 for vesselowners. Adjusting these figures by the Producer Price Index for FinishedGoods for the years 1980 to 1987 results in an estimated annual savings(in 1987 dollars) of $84,000 for the Coast Guard and $600,000 for vesselowners. These savings are based on the elimination of the overall costof the affidavit system, which was determined by evaluating the costs incurredby the Coast Guard to grant initial affidavit acceptances, evaluate productsof affidavited manufacturers, and verify the proper use of affidavitedproducts; by manufacturers to comply with the requirements of the affidavitsystem; and by vessel owners to purchase products from affidavited manufacturers.Requiring vessel owners to periodically replace nonmetallic expansion jointsin seawater piping systems would result in an estimated annual cost (in1987 dollars) to vessel owners of approximately $2,520 for each steam propelledvessel and $1,172 for each diesel propelled vessel. In 1989, the U.S. fleetof vessels over 100 gross tons was made up of 937 diesel powered vesselsand 376 steam powered vessels. The average age of the diesel and steampowered vessel fleet is approximately 10 and 15 years old, respectively.The economic burden upon the maritime industry to replace nonmetallic expansionjoints within the existing fleet will be approximately $2,040,000 (in 1987dollars) spread over the next ten years, or an average annual cost of $204,000.Considering the age of the average existing vessel and taking into theaccount replacement of some older nonmetallic expansion joints throughroutine maintenance, it is projected that the cost to the industry duringthe first year of implementation of these regulations will be $350,000(in 1987 dollars). The economic benefits of periodic replacements of nonmetallicexpansion joints are difficult, if not impossible, to quantify. However,when the costs of vessel replacement and the loss of vessel revenues whichcould result from expansion joint failures are considered, the economicbenefits of periodic expansion joint replacement are substantial.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>These regulations have been evaluated in accordance with the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq</T3>.). As described in the Regulatory Policies and Proceduressection above, the effect of these regulations is to reduce Coast Guardand industry costs. Most of the changes clarify technical requirements,update lists of acceptable standards or editorially correct errors andwill have a minimal economic impact. There is no reason to assume thatthe deletion of the affidavit system as a result of proposed regulationswould cause small entities to be unable to effectively compete againstlarger concerns. To the contrary, the elimination of the affidavit systemshould increase sales opportunities for new companies entering the marinemarket because prospective clients would be unable to require a companyfirst to have an affidavit accepted by the Coast Guard. The regulationsrequiring periodic replacement of nonmetallic expansion joints would applyto owners of Coast Guard inspected and certificated vessels. Due to thecost of owning and operating a vessel, the annualized cost of replacementsis not considered to have a significant impact. The cost will be less onsmaller vessels than on larger ones.Therefore, the Coast Guard certifies under section 605(b) of the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 605(b)) that this final rule will not have asignificant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>These regulations contain no new information or recordkeeping requirements.The information collection requirements contained in this rulemaking havepreviously been approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) underthe provisions of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq</T3>.) and have been assigned OMB control number 2115-0142.Section 50.25-10 eliminates the requirement for a manufacturer's affidavit,Form CG-935A, thus reducing this paperwork burden. The savings associatedwith this reduction have been previously discussed.Section 56.01-10(f) reduces the number of arrangement drawings requiredto be submitted. Arrangement drawings are unnecessary if certain conditionsare satisfied, e.g., the information is satisfactorily presented on associateddiagrams.<ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Implications</ITAG>This action has been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteriacontained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determined that thisrulemaking does not have sufficient federalism implications to warrantthe preparation of a Federalism Assessment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Assessment</ITAG>The Coast Guard has considered the environmental impact of these regulationsand concluded that, under section 2.B.2. of Commandant Instruction M16475.1B,these regulations will have no significant environmental impact and arecategorically excluded from further environmental documentation. The proposedregulations revise existing regulations to clarify technical requirements,correct errors, and substitute industry standards for existing regulatoryrequirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 46 CFR Parts 50, 56, and 61</ITAG>Incorporation by reference, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Vessels.For the reasons set out in the preamble, chapter I of title 46, parts 50,56, and 61 of the Code of Federal Regulations are amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 50_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 50 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>43 U.S.C. 1333; 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 5115; E.O. 12234,45 FR 58801, 3 CFR, 1980 Comp., p. 277; 49 CFR 1.45, 1.46; andSection; 50.01-20also issued under the authority of 44 U.S.C. 3507.</ITAG>2.-3. A new andSection; 50.10-23 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.10-23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marine Safety Center.</ITAG>The term ``Marine Safety Center'' refers to the Commanding Officer, U.S.Coast Guard, Marine Safety Center, 400 7th St., SW., Washington, DC 20590.4. Section 50.15-1 is amended by revising the section heading and paragraph(b) and removing paragraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.15-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General acceptance of standard requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) The issue of the industry specification, standard, or code describedin this subchapter as incorporated by reference, is generally acceptedas an alternate during plan review and approval, or for repair or replacement.The Commandant (G-MTH) may authorize the use of an issue of an earlieror later date when circumstances warrant such action.5. Section 50.15-20 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(13)and adding new paragraph (a)(14) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.15-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional standards.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) American Boat and Yacht Council, Inc. (ABYC), 305 Headquarters Drive,Suite 3, Millersville, MD 21108.(2) American Petroleum Institute (API), 1220 L Street, NW., Washington,DC 20005.(3) American Welding Society (AWS), United Engineering Center, 345 East47th Street, New York, NY 10017.(4) Commercial Standards, Commerce Department, National Bureau of Standards,Washington, DC 20234.(5) Compressed Gas Association (CGA), 1235 Jefferson Davis Highway, Suite501, Arlington, VA 22202.(6) Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association, Inc. (EJMA), 25 North Broadway,Tarrytown, NY 10591.(7) Fluid Controls Institute, Inc. (FCI), 31 South Street, Suite 303, Morristown,NJ 07960.(8) Manufacturers' Standardization Society of the Value and Fittings Industry(MSS), 127 Park Street, NE., Vienna, VA 22180.(9) Military specifications, which may be obtained from the CommandingOfficer, Naval Supply Depot, 5801 Tabor Avenue, Philadelphia, PA 19120.(10) National Fire Protection Association (NFPA), Batterymarch Park, Quincy,MA 02269.(11) National Fluid Power Association (NFPA), Post Office Box 49, Theinsville,WI 53092.(12) Society of Automotive Engineers, Inc. (SAE), 400 Commonwealth Drive,Warrendale, PA 15096.(13) Tubular Exchanger Manufacturers' Association, Inc. (TEMA), 25 NorthBroadway, Tarrytown, NY 10591.(14) Underwriters' Laboratories, Inc. (UL), 12 Laboratory Drive, ResearchTriangle Park, NC 27709.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Section 50.20-5 is amended by revising paragraphs (b) and (c), removingexisting paragraph (d) and redesignating paragraph (e) as paragraph (d)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.20-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for submittal of plans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) The plans, except as noted in paragraph (c) of this section, may besubmitted in duplicate to the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, ator nearest the place where the vessel is to be built. Alternatively, plansmay be submitted in triplicate to the Marine Safety Center.(c) Plans for nuclear vessels should be submitted in triplicate to theCommandant (G-MTH).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>7. Section 50.20-15 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.20-15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Previously approved plans.</ITAG>(a) * * *(3) A copy of the approved plan is available for review by the approvingoffice.8. The heading of subpart 50.25 is revised to read ``Acceptance of Materialand Piping Components.''9. Section 50.25-1 is revised to read as follows and Table 50.25-1(a) isremoved:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.25-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) Materials and piping components used in the construction of boilers,pressure vessels, pressure piping systems, and related components are acceptedby review of manufacturer or mill certificates under andSection; 50.25-3of this part, product marking in accordance with an adopted industry standard,or technical information indicating their compliance with the requirementsof this subchapter.(b) Plate, bar stock, pipe, tube, pipe joining fittings (tees, elbows,reducers, etc.), bolting, castings, forgings, and flanges, are acceptedby review of manufacturer or mill certificates under andSection;andSection;50.25-3, 50.25-5, and 50.25-7 of this part.(c) Valves, fluid conditioner fittings, and special purpose fittings complyingwith an adopted industry standard and marked in accordance with the standardare accepted through review of the marking indicating compliance with theadopted industry standard.(d) Valves, fluid conditioner fittings, special purpose fittings, and pipejoining fittings not complying with an adopted industry standard are acceptedfor use on a case-by-case basis. Acceptance is granted by the Marine SafetyCenter or the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, having cognizance overthe installation of the product. To obtain acceptance of a product, themanufacturer must submit, via the vessel owner or representative, the informationdescribed in andSection; 50.25-10 of this part to the Marine Safety Centeror the cognizant Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection.(e) Components designed for hydraulic service which require shock testingunder andSection; 58.30-15(f) of this chapter and nonmetallic flexible hoseassemblies must be accepted by the Commandant (G-MTH). Manufacturers desiringacceptance of these products must submit information necessary to showcompliance with andSection;andSection; 56.60-25(c) or 58.30-17 of this chapter,as applicable. Acceptance of specific installations of acceptable nonmetallicflexible hose assemblies and shock tested hydraulic components is grantedby the Marine Safety Center or the cognizant Officer in Charge, MarineInspection, as described in paragraph (d) of this section.(f) The vessel owner or representative shall make available to the Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection, the manufacturer or mill certificates, specificletters of acceptance, or approved plans necessary to verify that pipingcomponents comply with the requirements of this subchapter.10. In andSection; 50.25-3, paragraph (a) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.25-3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manufacturer or mill certification.</ITAG>(a) A manufacturer or mill producing materials used in certain productsfor installation on inspected vessels, shall issue a certificate or milltest report which shall report the results of chemical analysis and mechanicalproperties required by the ASTM specification.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>11. Section andSection; 50.25-5 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and(d)(3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.25-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Products requiring manufacturer or mill certification.</ITAG>(a) Products required to be certified by a manufacturer or by mill certificateshall be fabricated and tested in accordance with the applicable specifications.Such products will not normally be subject to mill inspection by the CoastGuard except as required by andSection; 50.25-7.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(3) In the opinion of the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, the applicationof the product does not require knowledge of the exact chemical analysisor mechanical properties enumerated on the manufacturer or mill certificate.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>12. Section 50.25-7 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.25-7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Testing of products required to be certified in presence of marineinspector.</ITAG>(a) Certified products are not normally tested in the presence of a marineinspector. The Commandant may, however, assign a marine inspector to witnesstests required by the applicable specifications to satisfy himself thatthe requirements are met.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>13. Section 50.25-10 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.25-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acceptance of piping components by specific letter or approved plan.</ITAG>(a) A manufacturer of a piping component which does not comply with anadopted industry standard and requires acceptance by specific letter orapproved plan must do the following:(1) Submit an engineering type catalog or representative drawings of thecomponent which includes the pressure and temperature ratings of the componentand identify the service for which it is intended.(2) Identify materials used to fabricate the component. Materials mustmeet the requirements of subpart 56.60 of this chapter. If the componentis not manufactured to accepted material specifications, the manufacturermust prove equivalency to accepted material specifications by comparingdetails of the materials' chemical composition, mechanical properties,method of manufacture, and complete chemical and mechanical test resultswith an accepted material specification.(3) Identify the industry standard, if any, to which the component is manufactured.(4) Submit a description of nondestructive testing performed on the component.(5) Submit a description of the marking applied to the component.(6) Submit information showing compliance with the requirements of part56, subparts 56.15, 56.20, 56.25, 56.30, or 56.35 of this chapter, as applicable.(7) Submit any additional information necessary to evaluate the component'sacceptability for its intended application.(b) If the component is found to comply with the requirements of this subchapter,the component is designated as acceptable for its intended installation.This acceptance is in the form of a specific letter relating directly tothe particular component or in the form of an approved piping system planin which the component is identified as an integral part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 50.25-15, 50.25-20, 50.25-25, 50.25-30, 50.25-35and 50.25-40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>14. Sections 50.25-15, 50.25-20, 50.25-25, 50.25-30, 50.25-35, and 50.25-40are removed.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 56_PIPING SYSTEMS AND APPURTENANCES [AMENDED]</ITAG>15. The authority citation for part 56 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1321(j), 1509; 43 U.S.C. 1333; 46 U.S.C.3306, 3703, 5115; E.O. 11735, 38 FR 21243, 3 CFR, 1971-1975 Comp., p. 793;E.O. 12234, 45 FR 58801, 3 CFR, 1980 Comp., p. 277; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>16. In the note to subpart 56.01 preceding andSection; 56.01-1, ``USAS-B31.1''is revised to read ``ANSI B31.1''.17. A new andSection; 56.01-2 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.01-2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference.</ITAG>(a) Certain standards and specifications are incorporated by referenceinto this part with the approval of the Director of the Federal Registerin accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than theone listed in paragraph (b) of this section, notice of the change mustbe published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and is available from the sources indicatedin paragraph (b).(b) The standards and specifications approved for incorporation by referencein this part, and the sections affected are:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,7/8,g1,t1,i1,s20,xs64 </C> <H1>  </H1><H1> </H1>American National Standards Institute (ANSI); 1430 Broadway, New York,NY 10018:<ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B1.1-82 Unified Inch Screw Threads (UN and UNR Thread Form)</ITAG><D>56.60-1; 56.25-20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B1.20.1-83 Pipe Threads, General Purpose (Inch)</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B1.20.3-76 (reaffirmed 1982) Dryseal Pipe Threads (Inch)</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.1-75 Cast Iron Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings, Class 25,125, 250 and 800</ITAG><D>56.60-1; 56.60-10</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.3-85 Malleable Iron Threaded Fittings, Classes 150 and 300</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.4-85 Cast Iron Threaded Fittings, Classes 125 and 250</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.5-81 Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings</ITAG><D>56.25-20;</D><P>56.30-10; 56.60-1</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.9-86 Factory-Made Wrought Steel Buttwelding Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.10-86 Face-to-Face and End-to-End Dimensions of Valves</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.11-80 Forged Steel Fittings, Socket-Welding and Threaded</ITAG><D>56.30-5; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.14-83 Ferrous Pipe Plugs, Bushings, and Locknuts with PipeThreads</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.15-85 Cast Bronze Threaded Fittings, Classes 125 and 250</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.18-84 Cast Copper Alloy Solder Joint Pressure Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.20-73 Ring-Joint Gaskets and Grooves for Steel Pipe Flanges</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.21-78 Nonmetallic Flat Gaskets for Pipe Flanges</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.22-80 Wrought Copper and Copper Alloy Solder Joint PressureFittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.23-84 Cast Copper Alloy Solder Joint Drainage Fittings_DWV</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.24-79 Bronze Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings, Class 150and 300</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.25-86 Buttwelding Ends </ITAG><D>56.60-1; 56.30-5; </D><P>56.70-10</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.28-86 Wrought Steel Buttwelding Short Radius Elbows and Returns</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.29-86 Wrought Copper and Wrought Copper Alloy Solder JointDrainage Fittings_DWV</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.34-88 Valves-Flanged, Threaded and Welding End</ITAG><D>56.20-1; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B16.42-87 Ductile Iron Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings, Classes150 and 300</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B18.2.1-81 Square and Hex Bolts and Screws, Inch Series</ITAG><D>56.25-20; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B18.2.2-87 Square and Hex Nuts (Inch Series)</ITAG><D>56.25-20; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B31.1-86 Power Piping </ITAG><D>56.01-5</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B36.10M-85 Welded and Seamless Wrought Steel Pipe</ITAG><D>56.07-5; 56.30-20; </D><P>56.60-1</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ANSI B36.19M-85 Stainless Steel Pipe</ITAG><D>56.07-5; 56.60-1</D>American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME): United Engineering Center,345 East 47th Street, New York, NY 10017:<ITAG tagnum="13">Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="5">Section I, Power Boilers, 1986 with addenda</ITAG><D>56.15-5; 56.15-10;</D><P>56.60-1; 56.60-1;</P><P>56.70-15; 56.95-10</P><P>56.15-1</P><ITAG tagnum="5">Section III, Rules for the Construction of Nuclear Power Plant Components,1986 with addenda</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="5">Section VIII, Division 1, Pressure Vessels, 1986 with addenda</ITAG><D>56.15-1; 56.15-5;</D><P>56.15-10; 56.25-5;</P><P>56.30-10; 56.30-30;</P><P>56.60-15; 56.60-1;</P><P>56.95-10</P><ITAG tagnum="5">Section IX, Welding and Brazing Qualifications, 1986 with addenda</ITAG><D>56.70-5; 56.70-20;</D><P>56.75-20; 56.85-10</P>American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM), 1916 Race Street, Philadelphia,PA 19103:<ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 36-84a Structural Steel</ITAG><D>56.30-10</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 47-84 Malleable Iron Castings </ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 53-84a Pipe, Steel, Black and Hot-Dipped, Zinc-Coated, Weldedand Seamless</ITAG><D>56.10-5</D><P>56.60-1</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 106-84a Seamless Carbon Steel Pipe for High-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 126-84 Gray Iron Castings for Valves, Flanges, and Pipe Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 134-80 Pipe, Steel, Electric-Fusion (ARC)-Welded (Sizes NPS16 and Over</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 135-84 Electric-Resistance-Welded Steel Pipe</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 139-84 Electric-Fusion (Arc)-Welded Steel Pipe (Sizes 4 in.and over)</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 178-84a Electric-Resistance-Welded Carbon Steel Boiler Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 179-84 Seamless Cold-Drawn Low-Carbon Steel Heat-Exchanger andCondenser Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 182-84c Forged or Rolled Alloy-Steel Pipe Flanges, Forged Fittings,and Valves and Parts for High-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 192-84a Seamless Carbon Steel Boiler Tubes for High-PressureService</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 194-84a Carbon and Alloy Steel Nuts for Bolts for High-Pressureand High-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 197-79 Cupola Malleable Iron</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 199-84 Seamless Cold-Drawn Intermediate Alloy-Steel Heat-Exchangerand Condenser Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 210-84a Seamless Medium-Carbon Steel Boiler and SuperheaterTubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 213-84b Seamless Ferritic and Austenitic Alloy-Steel Boiler,Superheater, and Heat-Exchanger Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 214-84a Electric-Resistance-Welded Carbon Steel Heat-Exchangerand Condenser Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 226-84a Electric-Resistance-Welded Carbon Steel Boiler and SuperheaterTubes for High-Pressure Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 234-84a Piping Fittings of Wrought Carbon Steel and Alloy Steelfor Moderate and Elevated Temperatures</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 249-84b Welded Austenitic Steel Boiler, Superheater, Heat-Exchanger,and Condenser Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 268-84a Seamless and Welded Ferritic Stainless Steel Tubingfor General Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 276-84a Stainless and Heat-Resisting Steel Bars and Shapes</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 307-84 Carbon Steel Externally Threaded Standard Fasteners</ITAG><D>56.25-20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 312-84c Seamless and Welded Austenitic Stainless Steel Pipe</ITAG><D>56.50-105; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 320-84a Alloy-Steel Bolting Materials for Low-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 333-84b Seamless and Welded Steel Pipe for Low-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 334-84b Seamless and Welded Carbon and Alloy-Steel Tubes forLow Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 335-84a Seamless Ferritic Alloy Steel Pipe for High-TemperatureService</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 350-84a Forgings, Carbon and Low-Alloy Steel, Requiring NotchToughness Testing for Piping Components</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 351-84a Steel Castings, Austenitic, for High-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 352-84a Steel Castings, Ferritic and Martensitic, for Pressure-ContainingParts Suitable for Low-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 358-84b Electric-Fusion-Welded Austenitic Chromium-Nickel AlloySteel Pipe for High-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 369-84 Carbon and Ferric Alloy Steel Forged and Bored Pipe forHigh Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 376-84 Seamless Austenitic Steel Pipe for High-Temperature Central-StationService </ITAG><D>56.07-10; 56.60-1; </D><P>56.60-2</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 395-80 Ferritic Ductile Iron Pressure-Retaining Castings forUse at Elevated Temperatures</ITAG><D>56.60-1; 56.50-60;</D><P>56.60-15</P><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 403-84a Wrought Austenitic Stainless Steel Piping Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 420-84 Piping Fittings of Wrought Carbon Steel and Alloy Steelfor Low-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 430-84a Austenitic Steel, Forged and Bored Pipe for High-TemperatureService</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 520-72 Supplementary Requirements for Seamless and Electrical-Resistance-WeldedCarbon Steel Tubular Products for High-Temperature Service Conforming toISO Recommendations for Boiler Construction</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 522-81 Forged or Rolled 8 and 9% Nickel Alloy Steel Flanges,Fittings, Valves, and Parts for Low-Temperature Service</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 575-81 Steel Bars, Carbon, Merchant Quality, M-Grades</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM A 576-81 Steel Bars, Carbon, Hot-Wrought, Special Quality</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 16-85 Free-Cutting Brass Road, Bar, and Shapes for Use in Shapesfor Use in Screw Machines</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 21-83b Naval Brass Rod, Bar, and Shapes</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 26-84 Aluminum-Alloy Sand Castings</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 42-84 Seamless Copper Pipe, Standard Sizes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 43-84 Seamless Red Brass Pipe, Standard Sizes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 68-83 Seamless Copper Tubes, Bright Annealed</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 75-84 Seamless Copper Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 85-84 Aluminum-Alloy Die Castings</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 88-83a Seamless Copper Water Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 96-84a Copper Silicon Alloy Plate and Sheet, Strip, and RolledBar for General Purposes and Pressure Vessels</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 111-85 Copper and Copper-Alloy Seamless Condenser Tubes andFerrule Stock</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 124-84 Copper and Copper-Alloy Forging Rod, Bar, and Shapes</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 154-82 Mercurous Nitrate Test for Copper and Copper Alloys</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 161-81 Nickel Seamless Pipe and Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 165-81 Nickel-Copper Alloy (UNS N04400) Seamless Pipe and Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 167-80 Nickel-Chromium-Iron Alloy (UNS N06600-N06690) SeamlessPipe and Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 171-85a Copper-Alloy Condenser Tube Plates</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 210-82a Aluminum-Alloy Drawn Seamless Tubes</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 234-85 Aluminum-Alloy Drawn Seamless Tubes for Condensers andHeat Exchangers</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 241-83a Aluminum-Alloy Seamless Pipe and Seamless Extruded Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 280-83 Seamless Copper Tube for Air Conditioning and RefrigerationField Service</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 283-83b Copper and Copper-Alloy Die Forgings (Hot-Pressed)</ITAG><D>56.60-2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 315-85 Seamless Copper-Alloy Pipe and Tube</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM B 361-81 Factory-Made Wrought Aluminum and Aluminum-Alloy WeldingFittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 635-81 Rate of Burning and/or Extent and Time of Burning ofSelf-Supporting Plastics in a Horizontal Position</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 1785-83 Poly(Vinyl Chloride)(PVC) Plastic Pipe, Schedules 40,80, and 120</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2241-84 Poly(Vinyl Chloride) (PVC) Pressure-Rated Pipe (SDR-Series)</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2464-76 Threaded Poly(Vinyl Chloride) (PVC) Plastic Pipe Fittings,Schedule 80</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2466-78 Poly(Vinyl Chloride) (PVC) Plastic Pipe Fittings, Schedule40</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2467-76a Socket-Type Poly(Vinyl Chloride)(PVC) Plastic PipeFittings, Schedule 80</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2665-82 Poly(Vinyl Chloride) (PVC) Plastic Drain, Waste, andVent Pipe and Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM D 2863-77 Measuring the Minimum Oxygen Concentration to SupportCandle-Like Combustion of Plastic (Oxygen Index)</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM E 23-82 Notched Bar Impact Testing of Metallic Materials</ITAG><D>56.50-105</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 682-82a Wrought Carbon Steel Sleeve-Type Pipe Couplings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1006-86 Entrainment Separators for Use in Marine Piping Applications</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1007-86 Pipe-Line Expansion Joints of the Packed Slip Type forMarine Application</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1020-86 Line-Blind Valves for Marine Applications</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1120-87 Circular Metallic Bellows Type Expansion Joints forPiping</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1123-87 Non-Metallic Expansion Joints </ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1139-88 Steam Traps and Drains</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1172-88 Fuel Oil Meters of the Volumetric Positive DisplacementType</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1173-88 Epoxy Resin Fiberglass Pipe and Fittings to be Usedfor Marine Applications</ITAG><D>56.60-1; 56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1199-88 Cast (All Temperatures and Pressures) and Welded PipeLine Strainers (150 psig and 150</ITAG>anddegrees;F Maximum<D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1200-88 Fabricated (Welded) (Pipe Line Strainers (Above 150psig and 150</ITAG>anddegrees;F)<D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">ASTM F 1201-88 Fluid Conditioner Fittings in Piping Applications Above0</ITAG>anddegrees;F<D>56.60-1</D>Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association Inc. (EJMA) 25 North Broadway,Tarrytown, NY 10591:<ITAG tagnum="3">Standards of the Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association, 1980</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D>Fluid Controls Institute Inc. (FCI) 31 South Street, Suite 303, Morristown,NY 07960:<ITAG tagnum="3">FCI 69-1 Pressure Rating Standard for Steam Traps</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D>Manufacturers Standardization Society of the Valve and Fittings Industry,Inc. (MSS) 127 Park Street NE, Vienna, VA 22180:<ITAG tagnum="3">SP-6-85 Standard Finishes for Contact Faces of Pipe Flanges and Connecting-EndFlanges of Valves and Fittings</ITAG><D>56.25-10; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-9-87 Spot Facing for Bronze, Iron and Steel Flanges</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-25-88 Standard Marking System for Valves, Fittings, Flanges andUnions</ITAG><D>56.15-1; 56.20-5;</D><P>56.60-1</P><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-44-85 Steel Pipe Line Flanges</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-45-87 Bypass and Drain Connection Standard</ITAG><D>56.20-20; 56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-51-86 Class 150LW Corrosion Resistant Cast Flanges and Flanged Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-53-85 Quality Standard for Steel Castings and Forgings for Valves,Flanges and Fittings and Other Piping Components_Magnetic Particle ExaminationMethod</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-55-85 Quality Standard for Steel Castings for Valves, Flanges andFittings and Other Piping Components_Visual Method</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-58-83 Pipe Hangers and Supports_Materials, Design and Manufacture</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-61-85 Pressure Testing of Steel Valves</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-67-83 Butterfly Valves</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-69-83 Pipe Hangers and Supports_Selection and Application</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-72-87 Ball Valves with Flanged or Butt-Welding Ends for GeneralService</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-73-86 Brazing Joints for Wrought and Cast Copper Alloy Solder JointPressure Fittings</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D><ITAG tagnum="3">SP-83-87 Steel Pipe Unions, Socket-Welding and Threaded</ITAG><D>56.60-1</D>Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE), 400 Commonwealth Drive, Warrendale,Pa 15096:<ITAG tagnum="3">J343-80 Tests and Procedures for SAE 100R Series Hydraulic Hose andHose Assemblies</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D><ITAG tagnum="3">J1475-84 Hydraulic Hose Fittings for Marine Applications</ITAG><D>56.60-25</D></ITAG>18. Section 56.01-3 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.01-3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Power boiler external piping (Replaces 100.1.1, 100.1.2, 111.6, 122.1,132 and 133).</ITAG>(a) Power boiler external piping and components must meet the requirementsof this part and andSection;andSection; 52.01-105, 52.01-110, 52.01-115, and52.01-120 of this chapter.(b) Specific requirements for power boiler external piping and appurtenances,as defined in andSection;andSection;100.1.1 and 100.1.2, appearing in the variousparagraphs of ANSI B31.1, are not adopted unless specifically indicatedelsewhere in this part.19. In Table 56.01-5(a), the entry ``Table 126.1 modified by * * * 56.30-5(c)(3),56.60-1.'' is revised to read ``Table 126.1 replaced by * * * 56.60-1.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.01-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>20. Section 56.01-6 is removed.21. Section 56.01-10 is amended by revising paragraphs (c)(1)(vii) and(c)(1)(xiii), removing paragraph (c)(1)(xviii), and adding a new paragraph(f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.01-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plan approval.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c)(1) * * *(vii) Tank cleaning piping.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(xiii) Hot water heating systems if the temperature is greater than 121anddegrees;C(250anddegrees;F).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(xviii) [Removed]<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) Arrangement drawings specified in paragraph (c)(2) of this sectionare not required if_(1) The location of each component for which there is a location requirement(i.e., shell penetration, fire station, foam monitor, etc.) is indicatedon the piping diagram;(2) The diagram includes, or is accompanied by and makes reference to,a material schedule which describes components in sufficient detail tosubstantiate their compliance with the regulations of this subchapter;(3) A thermal stress analysis is not required; and(4) A dynamic analysis is neither required nor elected in lieu of allowablestress reduction.22. In Table 56.04-1 of andSection; 56.04-1, remove the number ``5'' afterthe word ``subchapter''.23. Section 56.04-10 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.04-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other systems.</ITAG>Piping systems and appurtenances not requiring plan approval may be acceptedby the marine inspector if:(a) The system is suitable for the service intended,(b) There are guards, shields, insulation and similar devices where neededfor protection of personnel,(c) Failure of the systems would not hazard the vessel, personnel or vitalsystems, and(d) The system is not manifestly unsafe.24. Section 56.07-5 is amended by revising paragraph (e) and adding paragraphs(f) and (g) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.07-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions (modifies 100.2).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Nonstandard fittings</T3>. ``Nonstandard fitting'' means a componentof a piping system which is not fabricated under an adopted industry standard.(f) <T3>Vital system</T3>. A ``vital system'' is one which is essential tothe safety of the vessel, its passengers and crew.(g) <T3>Plate flange</T3>. The term ``plate flange,'' as used in this Subchapter,means a flange made from plate material, and may have a raised face and/ora raised hub.25. Section 56.07-10 is amended by revising paragraphs (c), (d)(1) and(d)(2), and the first sentence of paragraph (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.07-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Design conditions and criteria (modifies 101-104.7).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Ship motion dynamic effects (replaces 101.5.3). </T3>(1) In Class I,I-L, and II-L systems, the full allowable stress permitted by these regulationsmay be used only if:(i) The effects of ship motion and flexure, including collision, weight,yaw, sway, roll, pitch, heave and vibration, are taken into account byeither calculations or model testing acceptable to the Coast Guard; and(ii) Additional nondestructive testing that provides complete volumetricexamination of the material (e.g., Supplemental Requirement S6.1 to ASTMA376 for ultrasonics or other forms of nondestructive examination acceptableto the Coast Guard) is performed.(2) Otherwise, 80% or less of the allowable stress permitted must be usedin Class I, I-L and II-L systems. This reduction in allowable stress isnot intended to take into account impact loading inside the piping system,such as water or steam hammer and hydraulic shock.(3) For Class II systems the full allowable stress may be used withoutthe requirements of paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (c)(1)(ii) of this section.(d) * * *(1) The details of components not having specific ratings as describedin 102.2.2 of ANSI B31.1 must be furnished to the Marine Safety Centerfor approval.(2) Boiler blowoff piping must be designed in accordance with andSection;56.50-40 of this part.(e) Materials for use in piping systems must be selected as described inandSection; 56.60-1(a) of this part. * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>26. Section 56.10-5 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.10-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pipe.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Ferrous pipe</T3>. ASTM Specification A53 furnace welded pipe shallnot be used for combustible or flammable liquids within machinery spaces.(See andSection;andSection; 30.10-15 and 30.10-22 of this chapter.)<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>27. Subpart 56.15 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 56.15_Fittings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.15-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pipe joining fittings.</ITAG>(a) Pipe joining fittings certified in accordance with Subpart 50.25 ofthis subchapter are acceptable for use in piping systems.(b) Threaded, flanged, socket-welding, buttwelding, and socket-brazingpipe joining fittings, made in accordance with the applicable standardsin Tables 56.60-1(a) and 56.60-1(b) of this part and of materials complyingwith Subpart 56.60 of this part, may be used in piping systems within thematerial, size, pressure, and temperature limitations of those standardsand within any further limitations specified in this subchapter. Fittingsmust be designed for the maximum pressure to which they may be subjected,but in no case less than 50 pounds per square inch gage.(c) Pipe joining fittings not accepted for use in piping systems in accordancewith paragraph (b) of this section must meet the following:(1) All pressure-containing materials must be accepted in accordance withandSection; 56.60-1 of this part.(2) Fittings must be designed so that the maximum allowable working pressuredoes not exceed one-fourth of the burst pressure or produce a primary stressgreater than one-fourth of the ultimate tensile strength of the materialfor Class II systems and for all Class I, I-L, and II-L systems receivingship motion dynamic analysis and nondestructive examination. For ClassI, I-L, or II-L systems not receiving ship motion dynamic analysis andnondestructive examination under andSection; 56.07-10(c) of this part, themaximum allowable working pressure must not exceed one-fifth of the burstpressure or produce a primary stress greater than one-fifth of the ultimatetensile strength of the material. The maximum allowable working pressuremay be determined by_ (i) Calculations comparable to those of ANSI B31.1 or Section VIII of theASME Code;(ii) Subjecting a representative model to a proof test or experimentalstress analysis described in paragraph A-22 of Section I of the ASME Code;or(iii) Other means specifically accepted by the Marine Safety Center.(3) Fittings must be tested in accordance with andSection; 56.97-5 of thispart.(4) If welded, fittings must be welded in accordance with Subpart 56.70of this part and Part 57 of this chapter or by other processes specificallyapproved by the Marine Safety Center. In addition, for fittings to be acceptedfor use in piping systems in accordance with this paragraph, the followingrequirements must be met:(i) For fittings sized three inches and below_(A) The longitudinal joints must be fabricated by either gas or arc welding;(B) One fitting of each size from each lot of 100 or fraction thereof mustbe flattened cold until the opposite walls meet without the weld developingany cracks;(C) One fitting of each size from each lot of 100 or fraction thereof mustbe hydrostatically tested to the pressure required for a seamless drawnpipe of the same size and thickness produced from equivalent strength material,as determined by the applicable pipe material specification; and(D) If a fitting fails to meet the test in paragraph (c)(4)(i)(B) or (c)(4)(i)(C)of this section, no fitting in the lot from which the test fitting waschosen is acceptable.(ii) For fittings sized above three inches_(A) The longitudinal joints must be fabricated by arc welding;(B) For pressures exceeding 150 pounds per square inch, each fitting mustbe radiographically examined as specified in Section VIII of the ASME Code;(C) For pressures not exceeding 150 pounds per square inch, the first fittingfrom each size in each lot of 20 or fraction thereof must be examined byradiography to ensure that the welds are of acceptable quality;(D) One fitting of each size from each lot of 100 or fraction thereof mustbe hydrostatically tested to the pressure required for a seamless drawnpipe of the same size and thickness produced from equivalent strength material,as determined by the applicable pipe material specification; and(E) If a fitting fails to meet the test in paragraph (c)(4)(ii)(C) or (c)(4)(ii)(D)of this section, no fitting in the lot from which the test fitting waschosen is acceptable.(d) Single welded butt joints without the use of backing strips may beemployed in the fabrication of pipe joining fittings of welded constructionprovided radiographic examination indicates that complete penetration isobtained.(e) Each pipe joining fitting must be marked in accordance with MSS StandardSP-25.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.15-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fluid conditioner fittings.</ITAG>(a) Fluid conditioner fittings certified in accordance with subpart 50.25of this subchapter are acceptable for use in piping systems.(b) Fluid conditioner fittings, not containing hazardous materials as definedin andSection; 150.115 of this chapter, which are made in accordance withthe applicable standards listed in Table 56.60-1(b) of this part and ofmaterials complying with subpart 56.60 of this part, may be used withinthe material, size, pressure, and temperature limitations of those standardsand within any further limitations specified in this subchapter.(c) The following requirements apply to nonstandard fluid conditioner fittingswhich do not contain hazardous materials as defined in andSection; 150.115of this chapter:(1) The following nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings must meet theapplicable requirements in andSection; 54.01-5 (c)(3), (c)(4), and (d) ofthis chapter or the remaining provisions in Part 54 of this chapter, exceptthat Coast Guard shop inspection is not required:(i) Nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings that have a net internal volumegreater than 0.04 cubic meters (1.5 cubic feet) and that are rated fortemperatures and pressures exceeding those specified as minimums for ClassI piping systems.(ii) Nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings that have an internal diameterexceeding 15 centimeters (inches) and that are rated for temperatures andpressures exceeding those specified as minimums for Class I piping systems.(2) All other nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings must meet the following:(i) All pressure-containing materials must be accepted in accordance withandSection; 56.60-1 of this part.(ii) Nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings must be designed so that themaximum allowable working pressure does not exceed one-fourth of the burstpressure or produce a primary stress greater than one-fourth of the ultimatetensile strength of the material for Class II systems and for all ClassI, I-L, and II-L systems receiving ship motion dynamic analysis and nondestructiveexamination. For Class I, I-L, or II-L systems not receiving ship motiondynamic analysis and nondestructive examination under andSection; 56.07-10(c)of this part, the maximum allowable working pressure must not exceed one-fifthof the burst pressure or produce a primary stress greater than one-fifthof the ultimate tensile strength of the material. The maximum allowableworking pressure may be determined by_(A) Calculations comparable to those of ANSI B31.1 or Section VIII of theASME Code;(B) Subjecting a representative model to a proof test or experimental stressanalysis described in paragraph A-22 of Section I of the ASME Code; or(C) Other means specifically accepted by the Marine Safety Center.(iii) Nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings must be tested in accordancewith andSection; 56.97-5 of this part.(iv) If welded, nonstandard fluid conditioner fittings must be welded inaccordance with Subpart 56.70 of this part and Part 57 of this chapteror by other processes specifically approved by the Marine Safety Center.(d) All fluid conditioner fittings that contain hazardous materials asdefined in andSection; 150.115 of this chapter must meet the applicable requirementsof part 54 of this chapter, except subpart 54.10.(e) Heat exchangers having headers and tubes and brazed boiler steam airheaters are not considered fluid conditioner fittings and must meet therequirements in part 54 of this chapter regardless of size. For brazedboiler steam air heaters, see also andSection; 56.30-30(b)(1) of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.15-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special purpose fittings.</ITAG>(a) Special purpose fittings certified in accordance with Subpart 50.25of this subchapter are acceptable for use in piping systems.(b) Special purpose fittings made in accordance with the applicable standardslisted in Table 56.60-1(b) of this part and of materials complying withsubpart 56.60 of this part, may be used within the material, size, pressure,and temperature limitations of those standards and within any further limitationsspecified in this subchapter. (c) Nonstandard special purpose fittings must meet the requirements ofandSection;andSection; 56.30-25, 56.30-40, 56.35-10, 56.35-15, or 56.35-35of this part, as applicable.28. Section 56.20-1 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.20-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) Valves certified in accordance with subpart 50.25 of this subchapterare acceptable for use in piping systems. (b) Non-welded valves complying with the standards listed in andSection;56.60-1 of this part may be used within the specified pressure and temperatureratings of those standards, provided the limitations of andSection; 56.07-10(c)of this part are applied. Materials must comply with subpart 56.60 of thispart. Welded valves complying with the standards and specifications listedin andSection; 56.60-1 of this part may be used in Class II systems onlyunless they meet paragraph (c) of this section. (c) All other valves must meet the following: (1) All pressure-containing materials must be accepted in accordance withandSection; 56.60-1 of this part. 2. Valves must be designed so that the maximum allowable working pressuredoes not exceed one-fourth of the burst pressure or produce a primary stressgreater than one-fourth of the ultimate tensile strength of the materialfor Class II systems and for all Class I, I-L, and II-L systems receivingship motion dynamic analysis and nondestructive examination. For ClassI, I-L, or II-L systems not receiving ship motion dynamic analysis andnondestructive examination under andSection; 56.07-10(c) of this part, themaximum allowable working pressure must not exceed one-fifth of the burstpressure or produce a primary stress greater than one-fifth of the ultimatetensile strength of the material. The maximum allowable working pressuremay be determined by_ (i) Calculations comparable to those of ANSI B31.1 or Section VIII of theASME Code, if the valve shape permits this; (ii) Subjecting a representative model to a proof test or experimentalstress analysis described in paragraph A-22 of Section I of the ASME Code;or (iii) Other means specifically accepted by the Marine Safety Center. (3) Valves must be tested in accordance with andSection; 56.97-5 of thispart.(4) If welded, valves must be welded in accordance with subpart 56.70 ofthis part and part 57 of this chapter or by other processes specificallyapproved by the Marine Safety Center. (d) Where liquid trapped in any closed valve can be heated and an uncontrollablerise in pressure can result, means must be provided in the design, installation,and operation of the valve to ensure that the pressure in the valve doesnot exceed that allowed by this part for the attained temperature. (Forexample, if a flexible wedge gate valve with the stem installed horizontallyis closed, liquid from testing, cleaning, or condensation can be trappedin the bonnet section of the closed valve.) Any resulting penetration ofthe pressure wall of the valve must meet the requirements of this partand those for threaded and welded auxiliary connections in ANSI B16.34.29. Section 56.20-9 is amended by revising paragraph (a), (b) and (c) toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.20-9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Valve construction. </ITAG>(a) All valves must close with a right-hand (clockwise) motion of the handwheelor operating lever when facing the end of the valve stem. Gate, globe andangle valves must generally be of the rising-stem type, preferably withthe stem threads external to the valve body. Where operating conditionswill not permit such installations, the use of nonrising-stem valves willbe permitted. Nonrising-stem valves, lever operated valves, and any othervalve where, due to design, the position of the disc or closure mechanismis not obvious shall be fitted with indicators to show whether the valveis opened or closed. Such indicators are not required for valves locatedin tanks or similar inaccessible spaces where indication is provided atthe remote valve operator. Operating levers of the quarter-turn (rotary)valves must be parallel to the fluid flow in the open position and perpendicularto the fluid flow in the closed position. (b) Valves of Class I piping systems (for restrictions in other classesrefer to sections on nuclear and low temperature service), having diametersexceeding 2 inches must have bolted, pressure seal, or breech lock bonnetsand flanged or welding ends, except that socket type welding ends shallnot be used where prohibited by andSection; 56.30-5(c) of this part, andSection;56.30-10(b)(4) of this part for the same pressure class, or elsewhere inthis part. For diameters not exceeding 2 inches, screwed union bonnet orbolted bonnet, or bonnetless valves of a type which will positively preventthe stem from screwing out of the body may be employed. Outside screw andyoke design must be used for valves 3 inches and larger for pressures above600 pounds per square inch gage. Cast iron valves with screwed-in or screwed-overbonnets are prohibited. Union bonnet type cast iron valves must have thebonnet ring made of steel, bronze, or malleable iron. (c) Valves must be designed for the maximum pressure to which they maybe subjected, but in no case shall the design pressure be less than 50pounds per square inch gage. The use of wafer type resilient seated valvesis not permitted for shell connections unless they are so arranged thatthe piping immediately inboard of the valve can be removed without affectingthe watertight integrity of the shell connection. Refer also to andSection;56.20-15(b)(2)(ii) of this part. Large fabricated ballast manifold connectinglines exceeding 8 inches nominal pipe size must be designed for a pressureof not less than 25 pounds per square inch gage. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>30. Section 56.20-15 is amended by revising the introductory sentence toparagraph (b) and paragraph (b)(2)(ii) and adding a new paragraph (c) toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.20-15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Valves employing resilient material. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Valves employing resilient material shall be divided into three categories:Category A, Category B, and positive shut-off. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) * * * (ii) Category B valves may be used in any piping system, except: In anylocation in a fixed fire extinguishing system or bilge system; as the positiveclosure for any opening in the shell of a vessel; in a position in whichthe valve serves as the positive shutoff valve required by andSection; 56.50-60(d)of this part for systems subject to internal head pressure from tanks containingflammable, combustible, or hazardous materials; or as otherwise prohibitedunder this subchapter. (c) Valves employing resilient material will be determined to be qualifiedas Category A, Category B, or positive shut-off as follows: (1) Category A_The closed valve must pass less than the greater of fivepercent or  15%/  (NPS) of its fully open flow rate through the line aftercomplete removal of all resilient seating material or equivalent and testingat full rated pressure. (Note._``NPS'' is nominal pipe size.) (2) Positive shutoff_The closed valve must pass less than 10 m1/hour (0.34fluid oz/hour) of liquid or 3 liters/hour (0.11 standard cubic feet/hour)of gas per inch nominal size through the line after removal of all resilientseating material or equivalent and testing at full rated pressure. Packingmaterial must be fire resistant. This valve type will be considered suitablefor internal head pressure from tanks (positive shutoff) as well as a CategoryA valve. (3) If a valve designer elects to use either calculations or actual firetesting in lieu of material removal and pressure testing, the proposedcalculation method or test plan must be accepted by the Commandant (G-MTH).(4) Category B_Valves containing resilient seating or packing material,nonmetallic composition discs, or similar components and which have notpassed one of the above tests are considered Category B valves.31. Section 56.25-5 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.25-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flanges. </ITAG>Flanges must conform to the design requirements of the applicable standardsof Table 56.60-1(b) of this part of Appendix 2 of section VIII of the ASMECode. Plate flanges must meet the requirements of andSection; 56.30-10(b)(5)of this part and the material requirements of andSection; 56.60-1(a) of thispart. Flanges may be integral or may be attached to pipe by threading,welding, brazing, or other means within the applicable standards specifiedin Table 56.60-1(b) of this part and the requirements of this subpart.For flange facing gasket combinations other than those specified above,calculations must be submitted indicating that the gaskets will not resultin a higher bolt loading or flange moment than for the acceptable configurations.32. Section 56.25-10 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.25-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flange facings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) When bolting class 150 standard steel flanges to flat face cast ironflanges, the steel flange must be furnished with a flat face, and boltingmust be in accordance with andSection; 56.25-20 of this part. Class 300 raisedface steel flanges may be bolted to class 250 raised face cast iron flangeswith bolting in accordance with andSection; 56.25-20(b) of this part.33. Section 56.25-20 is amended by revising paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and(d) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.25-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bolting. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) Bolts, studs, nuts, and washers must comply withapplicable standards and specifications listed in andSection; 56.60-1 ofthis part. Unless otherwise specified, bolting must be in accordance withANSI B16.5. (2) Bolts and studs must extend completely through the nuts. (3) See andSection; 58.30-15(c) of this chapter for exceptions on boltingused in fluid power and control systems. (b) Carbon steel bolts or bolt studs may be used if expected normal operatingpressure does not exceed 300 pounds per square inch gage and the expectednormal operating temperature does not exceed 400 anddegrees;F. Carbon steelbolts must have heavy hexagon heads in accordance with ANSI B18.2.1 andmust have heavy semifinished hexagonal nuts in accordance with ANSI B18.2.2,unless the bolts are tightly fitted to the holes and flange stress calculationstaking the bolt bending stresses into account are submitted. When class250 cast iron flanges are used or when class 125 cast iron flanges areused with ring gaskets, the bolting material must be carbon steel conformingto ASTM Specification A307, Grade B. (c) Alloy steel stud bolts must be threaded full length or, if desired,may have reduced shanks of a diameter not less than that at the root ofthe threads. They must have heavy semifinished hexagonal nuts in accordancewith ANSI B18.2.2. (d) All alloy bolts or bolt studs and accompanying nuts are recommendedto be threaded in accordance with ANSI B1.1, Class 2A external threads,and Class 2B internal threads (8-thread series 8UN for 1 inch and larger).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>34. Section 56.30-5 is amended by revising paragraphs (b)(3), (c), and(d) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Welded joints. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (3) Consumable insert rings must be used. Commonly used types of butt weldingend preparations are shown in ANSI B16.25. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Socket welds (modifies 127.3.3A)</T3>. (1) Socket welds must conformto ANSI B16.11, applicable standards listed in Table 56.60-1(b) of thispart, and Figure 127.4.4C in ANSI B31.1 as modified by andSection; 56.30-10(b)(4)of this part. A gap of approximately one-sixteenth inch between the endof the pipe and the bottom of the socket must be provided before welding.This may best be provided by bottoming the pipe and backing off slightlybefore tacking.  (2) Socket welds must not be used where severe erosion or crevice corrosionis expected to occur. Restrictions on the use of socket welds appear inandSection; 56.70-15(d)(3) of this part for Class I service and in andSection;56.50-105 of this part for low temperature service. These sections shouldbe checked when designing for these systems. See andSection; 56.70-15(d)(4)of this part for Class II service. (3) (Reproduces 111.3.4.) Drains and bypasses may be attached to a valveof fitting by socket welding provided the socket depth, bore diameter,and shoulder thickness conform to ANSI B16.11. (d) <T3>Fillet welds</T3>. Fillet welds may vary from convex to concave. Thesize of a fillet weld is determined as shown in Figure 127.4.4A of ANSIB31.1. Fillet weld details for socket-welding components must meet andSection;56.30-5(c) of this part. Fillet weld details for flanges must meet andSection;56.30-10 of this part. See also andSection; 56.70-15(d)(3) and (d)(4) ofthis part for applications of fillet welds. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>35. Section 56.30-10 is amended by adding the sentence ``Fillet weld legsize need not exceed the thickness of the applicable ANSI hub.'' to theend of the Note in Figure 56.30-10(b), and revising paragraphs (a), (b),and (b)(1) through (b)(5) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flanged joints (modifies 104.5.1(a)). </ITAG>(a) Flanged or butt-welded joints are required for Classes I and I-L pipingfor nominal diameters exceeding 2 inches, except as otherwise specifiedin this subchapter. (b) Flanges may be attached by any method shown in Figure 56.30-10(b) orby any additional means that may be approved by the Marine Safety Center.Pressure temperature ratings of the appropriate ANSI standard must notbe exceeded. (1) <T3>Figure 56.30-10(b), Method 1</T3>. Flanges with screw threads may beused in accordance with Table 56.30-20(c) of this part. (2) <T3>Figure 56.30-10(b), Method 2</T3>. ANSI B16.5 class 150 and class 300low-hubbed flanges with screw threads, plus the addition of a strengthfillet weld of the size as shown, may be used in Class I systems not exceeding750 anddegrees;F or 4 NPS, in Class II systems without diameter limitations,and in Class II-L systems not exceeding 1 NPS. If 100 percent radiographyis required by andSection; 56.95-10 of this part for the class, diameter,wall thickness, and material of pipe being joined, the use of the threadedflanges is not permitted and buttwelding flanges must be provided. ForClass II piping systems, the size of the strength fillet may be limitedto a maximum of 0.525 inch instead of 1.4T. (3) <T3>Figure 56.30-10(b), Method 3</T3>. ANSI B16.5 slip-on flanges may beused in Class I, Class II, or Class II-L systems not to exceed the servicepressure-temperature ratings for the class 300 and lower class flanges,within the temperature limitations of the material selected for use, andnot to exceed 4 NPS in Class I and Class II-L systems. If 100 percent radiographyis required by andSection; 56.95-10 of this part for the class, diameter,wall thickness, and material of the pipe being joined, the use of slip-onflanges is not permitted and a butt welding flange must be provided. Theconfiguration in Figure 127.4.4B(b) of ANSI B31.1. utilizing a face andbackweld may be preferable in those applications where it is desirableto eliminate void spaces. For Class II piping systems, the size of thestrength fillet may be limited to a maximum of 0.525 inch instead of 1.4Tand the distance from the face of the flange to the end of the pipe maybe a maximum of three-eighths inch. Restrictions on the use of slip-onflanges appear in andSection; 56.50-105 of this part for low temperaturepiping systems. (4) <T3>Figure 56.30-10(b), Method 4</T3>. ANSI B16.5 socket welding flangesmay be used in Class I or II-L systems not exceeding 3 NPS for class 600and lower class flanges and 2\1/2\ NPS for class 900 and class 1500 flangeswithin the service pressure-temperature ratings of the standard. Wheneverfull radiography is required by andSection; 56.95-10 for the class, diameter,and wall thickness of the pipe being joined, the use of socket weldingflanges in not permitted and a butt weld type connection must be provided.For Class II piping, socket welding flanges may be used without diameterlimitation, and the size of the fillet weld may be limited to a maximumof 0.525 inch instead of 1.4T. Restrictions on the use of socket weldsappear in andSection; 56.50-105 for low temperature piping systems. (5) <T3>Figure 56.30-10(b), Method 5</T3>. Flanges fabricated from steel platemeeting the requirements of Part 54 of this chapter may be used for ClassII piping for pressures not exceeding 150 pounds per square inch and temperaturesnot exceeding 450 anddegrees;F. Plate material listed in UCS-6(b) SectionVIII of the ASME Code may not be used in this application, except thatmaterial meeting ASTM Specification A36 may be used. The fabricated flangesmust conform at least to the American National Standard class 150 flangedimensions. The size of the strength fillet weld may be limited to a maximumof 0.525 inches instead of 1.4T and the distance from the face of the flangeto the end of the pipe may be a maximum of three-eighths inch. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>36. Section 56.30-20 is amended by revising the heading, paragraphs (a),(b), (c), and (d), footnotes 1 and 2 of Table 56.30-20(c), and relocatingTable 56.30-20(c) to follow paragraph (c), to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Threaded joints. </ITAG>(a) Threaded joints may be used within the limitations specified in subpart56.15 of this chapter and within other limitations specified in this section.(b) (Reproduces 114.1.) All threads on piping components must be taperpipe threads in accordance with the applicable standard listed in Table56.60-1(b). Threads other than taper pipe threads may be used for pipingcomponents where tightness of the joint depends on a seal weld or a seatingsurface other than the threads, and where experience or test has demonstratedthat such threads are suitable. (c) Threaded joints may not be used where severe erosion, crevice corrosion,shock, or vibration is expected to occur; or at temperatures over 925 anddegrees;F.Size limitations are given in Table 56.30-20(c) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1 Further restrictions on the use of threaded joints appear in thelow temperature piping section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2 Threaded joints in hydraulic systems are permitted above the pressuresindicated for the nominal sizes shown when commercially available componentssuch as pumps, valves and strainers may only be obtained with threadedconnections.</ITAG>(d) Pipe with a wall thickness less than that of standard weight of ANSIB36.10 steel pipe must not be threaded regardless of service. For additionalthreading limitations for pipe used in steam service over 250 pounds persquare inch or water service over 100 pounds per square inch and 200 anddegrees;F,see part 104.1.2(c)(1) of ANSI B31.1. Restrictions as to the use of threadedjoints appear for low temperature piping and should be checked when designingfor these systems.37. Section 56.30-25 is amended by revising paragraphs (a), (d), and (f)(2)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flared, flareless, and compression joints.</ITAG>(a) Flared, flareless, and compression type tubing fittings may be usedfor tube sizes not exceeding 2-inch outside diameter within the limitationsof applicable standards and specifications listed in andSection; 56.60-1of this part and as specified in this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) Threads must be either American National Standard taper pipe threadsor Dryseal American National Standard taper pipe threads. Threads otherthan taper pipe threads may be used for piping components where tightnessof the joint depends on a seating surface other than the threads and whereexperience or testing has demonstrated that the threads are suitable.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) * * *(2) Grip-type fittings that are tightened in accordance with the manufacturers'instructions need not be disassembled for checking. For fluid services(other than hydraulic systems) using a combustible fluid as defined inandSection; 30.10-15 of this chapter and for fluid services using a flammablefluid as defined in andSection; 30.10-22 of this chapter, flared fittingsmust be used; except that flareless fittings of the nonbite type may beused when the tubing system is of steel, nickel copper, or copper nickelalloy. When using copper or copper zinc alloys, flared fittings are required.See also andSection; 56.50-70 of this part for gasoline fuel systems andandSection; 56.50-75 of this part for diesel fuel systems. In the case ofhydraulic systems, flareless fittings of the bite type may be used whereexperience or testing has demonstrated that the fittings are suitable.38. Section 56.30-27 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Caulked joints.</ITAG>Caulked joints may not be used in marine installations.39. Section 56.30-40 is amended by revising paragraphs (a), (b), (e), and(f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.30-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flexible pipe couplings of the compression or slip-on type.</ITAG>(a) Flexible pipe couplings of the compression or slip-on type must notbe used as expansion joints. To ensure that the maximum axial displacement(approximately \3/8\andmin16;andmin16; maximum) of each coupling is not exceeded,positive restraints must be included in each installation.(b) Positive means must also be provided to prevent the coupling from ``creeping''on the pipe and uncovering the joint. Bite type devices do not providepositive protection against creeping and are not generally accepted forthis purpose unless other means are also incorporated. Machined groovesor centering pins are considered positive means, and other positive meanswill be considered.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) Flexible couplings made in accordance with the applicable standardslisted in Table 56.60-1(b) of this part and of materials complying withsubpart 56.60 of this part may be used within the material, size, pressure,and temperature limitations of those standards and within any further limitationsspecified in this subchapter. Flexible couplings fabricated by weldingmust also comply with part 57 of this chapter.(f) Flexible couplings must not be used in cargo holds or in any otherspace where leakage, undetected flooding, or impingement of liquid on vitalequipment may disable the ship, or in tanks where the liquid conveyed inthe piping system is not compatible with the liquid in the tank. Whereflexible couplings are not allowed by this subpart, joints may be threaded,flanged and bolted, or welded.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>40. Section 56.35-1 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (b) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.35-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pipe stress calculations (replaces 119.7).</ITAG>(a) A summary of the results of pipe stress calculations for the main andauxiliary steam piping where the design temperatures exceed 800 anddegrees;Fshall be submitted for approval. Calculations shall be made in accordancewith one of the recognized methods of stress analysis acceptable to theMarine Safety Center to determine the magnitude and direction of the forcesand movements at all terminal connections, anchor and junction points,as well as the resultant bending stress, longitudinal pressure stress,torsional stress, and combined expansion stress at all such points. Thelocation of the maximum combined stress shall be indicated in each runof pipe between anchor points. (b) Special consideration will be given to the use of the full tabulatedvalue of S in computing S<T2>h</T2> and S<T2>c</T2> where all material used in the system is subjected to additionalnondestructive testing as specified by the Marine Safety Center, and wherethe calculations prescribed in 119.6.4 and 102.3.2 of ANSI-B31.1 and andSection;56.07-10 are performed. The nondestructive testing procedures and methodof stress analysis shall be approved by the Marine Safety Center priorto the submission of computations and drawings for approval.41. Section 56.35-10 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.35-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonmetallic expansion joints (replaces 119.5.1).</ITAG>(a) Nonmetallic expansion joints certified in accordance with subpart 50.25of this subchapter are acceptable for use in piping systems.(b) Nonmetallic expansion joints must conform to the standards listed inTable 56.60-1(b) of this part. Nonmetallic expansion joints may be usedwithin their specified pressure and temperature rating in vital and nonvitalmachinery sea connections inboard of the skin valve. These joints mustnot be used to correct for improper piping workmanship or misalignment.Joint movements must not exceed the limits set by the joint manufacturer.42. Section 56.35-15 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.35-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Metallic expansion joints (replaces 119.5.1).</ITAG>(a) Metallic expansion joints certified in accordance with subpart 50.25of this subchapter are acceptable for use in piping systems.(b) Metallic expansion joints must conform to the standards listed in Table56.60-1(b) of this part and may be used within their specified pressureand temperature rating.43. Section 56.50-1 is amended by revising paragraphs (c), (g)(1), (g)(2)(iii),(g)(3), and (l) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General (Replaces 122.6 through 122.10).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Valves and cocks not forming part of a piping system are not permittedin watertight subdivision bulkheads, however, sluice valves or gates inoiltight bulkheads of tankships may be used if approved by the Marine SafetyCenter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g)(1) Power actuated valves in systems other than as specified in andSection;56.50-60 of this part may be used if approved for the system by the MarineSafety Center. All power actuated valves required in an emergency to operatethe vessel's machinery, to maintain its stability, and to operate the bilgeand firemain systems must have a manual means of operation.(2) * * *(iii) Remote valve controls, except reach rods, must be fitted with indicatorsthat show whether the valves they control are open or closed. Valve positionindicating systems must be independent of valve control systems.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) Air operated remote control valves must be provided with self-indicatinglines at the control boards which indicate the desired valve positions,i.e., open or closed.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(l) Where pipes are run through dry cargo spaces they must be protectedfrom mechanical injury by a suitable enclosure or other means.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>44. Section 56.50-5 is removed.45. Section 56.50-15 is amended by revising paragraph (h) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Steam and exhaust piping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h)(1) Steam piping, with the exception of the steam heating system, mustnot be led through passageways, accommodation spaces, or public spacesunless the arrangement is specifically approved by the Marine Safety Center.(2) Steam pressure in steam heating systems must not exceed 150 poundsper square inch gage, except that steam pressure for accommodation andpublic space heating must not exceed 45 pounds per square inch gage.(3) Steam lines and registers in non-accommodation and non-public spacesmust be suitably lcoated and/or shielded to minimize hazards to any personnelwithin the space. Where hazards in a space cannot be sufficiently minimized,the pressure in the steam line to that space must be reduced to a maximumof 45 pounds per square inch gage.(4) High temperature hot water for heating systems may not exceed 375 anddegrees;F.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>46. Section 56.50-20 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (c) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Pressure relief piping.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> There must be no intervening stop valves between thevessel or piping system being protected and its protective device or devices,except as specifically provided for in other regulations or as specificallyauthorized by the Marine Safety Center.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Stop valves.</T3> Stop valves between the safety or relief valve andthe point of discharge are not permitted, except as specifically providedfor in other regulations or as specifically approved by the Marine SafetyCenter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>47. Section 56.50-25 is amended by adding a sentence at the end of paragraph(d) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Safety and relief valve escape piping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * * Back pressure must be calculated with all relief valves whichdischarge to a common escape pipe relieving simultaneously at full capacity.48. Section 56.50-50 is amended by revising paragraphs (c)(1), (d)(1),Note 1 of paragraph (d)(2), the introductory text of paragraph (f), andparagraphs (f)(3), (h), and (k) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bilge and ballast piping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c)(1) Bilge suctions must be led from manifolds except as otherwise approvedby the Marine Safety Center. Insofar as practicable, manifolds must belocated in, or be capable of remote operation from, the same space as thebilge pump which normally takes suction on that manifold. In either case,the manifolds must be capable of being locally controlled from above thefloorplates, and be easily accessible at all times. Bilge overboard dischargevalves must comply with the location and accessibility requirements forsuction manifolds insofar as practicable. Except as otherwise permittedby paragraph (h) of this section for Great Lakes cargo vessels employinga common bilge and ballast system for the cargo spaces, bilge manifoldvalves controlling bilge suctions from various compartments must be ofthe stop-check type.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(1) For suctions to each main bilge pump:<ITAG tagnum="25">d=1+ L(B+D)/2500 (1)(4)(5)</ITAG>(2) * * *<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note 1. </T4>For tank vessels, ``L'' may be reduced by the combinedlength of the cargo oil tanks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) <T3>Emergency bilge suctions.</T3> In addition to the independent bilgesuction(s) required by paragraph (e) of this section, an emergency bilgesuction must be provided in the machinery space for all self-propelledvessels as described in the following subparagraphs. Emergency suctionsmust be provided from pumps other than those required by andSection; 56.50-55(a)of this part. Such suctions must have nonreturn valves, and must meet thefollowing criteria as appropriate:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) Vessels over 180 feet in length which are not passenger vessels andwhich operate on international voyages or in ocean, coastwise, or GreatLakes service, must be provided with a direct emergency bilge suction fromany pump in the machinery space, except that a required bilge pump maynot be used. The discharge capacity of the pump selected must exceed thecapacity of the required main bilge pump and the area of the suction inletis to be equal to the full suction inlet of the pump.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h) Pipes for draining cargo holds or machinery spaces must be separatefrom pipes which are used for filling or emptying tanks where water oroil is carried. Bilge and ballast piping systems must be so arranged asto prevent oil or water from the sea or ballast spaces from passing intocargo holds or machinery spaces, or from passing from one compartment toanother, whether from the sea, water ballast, or oil tanks, by the appropriateinstallation of stop and non-return valves. The bilge and ballast mainsmust be fitted with separate control valves at the pumps. The requirementsof this paragraph do not apply to bilge and ballast systems on Great Lakescargo vessels which may employ a common line for the bilge and ballastsystem for the cargo spaces.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(k) Where bilge and ballast piping is led through tanks, except ballastpiping in ballast tanks, means must be provided to minimize the risk offlooding of other spaces due to pipe failure within the tanks. In thisregard, such piping may be in an oiltight or watertight pipe tunnel, orthe piping may be of Schedule 80 pipe wall thickness, fitted with expansionbends, and all joints within the tanks are welded. Alternated designs maybe installed as approved by the Marine Safety Center. Where a pipe tunnelis installed, the watertight integrity of the bulkheads must be maintained.No valve or fitting may be located within the tunnel if the pipe tunnelis not of sufficient size to afford easy access. These requirements neednot be met provided the contents of the tank and piping system are chemicallycompatible and strength and stability calculations are submitted showingthat crossflooding resulting from a pipe, the tank, and the spaces throughwhich the piping passes will not seriously affect the safety of the ship,including the launching of lifeboats due to the ship's listing. Bilge linesled through tanks without a pipe tunnel must be fitted with nonreturn valvesat the bilge suctions.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>49. Section 56.50-55 is amended by revising Table 56.50-55(b)(1) and paragraphs(c) and (e)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bilge pumps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,s100,r100,r100,xs24</C><T4>Table </T4>56.50-55(b)(1)_Bilge Pumps Required for Nonself-PropelledVessels<H1>Type of vessel</H1><H1>Waters navigated</H1><H1>Power pumps </H1>(\1\)<H1>Hand pumps</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Sailing <D>Ocean and coastwise </D><D>Two </D><D/>(\2\)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Manned barges <D>......do </D><D>Two </D><D/>(\2\)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Manned barges <D>Other than ocean and coastwise </D><D/>(\3\) <D/>(\3\)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Unmanned barges <D>All waters </D><D/>(\3\) <D/>(\3\)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mobile offshore drilling units <D>All waters </D><D>Two </D><D>None.</D><F>\1\ Where power is always available, independent power bilge pumps shallbe installed as required and shall be connected to the bilge main.</F><F>\2\ Efficient hand pumps connected to the bilge main may be substitutedfor the power pumps. Where there is no common bilge main, one hand pumpwill be required for each compartment.</F><F>\3\ Suitable hand or power pumps or siphons, portable or fixed, carriedeither on board the barge or on the towing vessel shall be provided.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Capacity of independent power bilge pump.</T3> Each power bilge pumpmust have the capacity to develop a suction velocity of not less than 400feet per minute through the size of bilge main piping required by andSection;56.50-50(d)(1) of this part under ordinary conditions; except that, forvessels of less than 65 feet in length not engaged on international voyages,the pump must have a minimum capacity of 25 gallons per minute and neednot meet the velocity requirement of this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Location.</T3> (1) For self-propelled vessels, if the engines and boilersare in two or more watertight compartments, the bilge pumps must be distributedthroughout these compartments. On other self-propelled vessels and mobileoffshore drilling units, the bilge pumps must be in separate compartmentsto the extent practicable. When the location of bilge pumps in separatewatertight compartments is not practical, alternative arrangements maybe submitted for consideration by the Marine Safety Center.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>50. Section 56.50-60 is amended by revising the section heading, paragraphs(a), (c), (d) introductory text, (d)(1), (d)(2), (d)(3) introductory text,(d)(3)(i), and (d)(4), and adding new paragraphs (h), (i), (j), (k) and(l) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Systems containing oil.</ITAG>(a)(1) Oil-Piping systems for the transfer or discharge of cargo or fueloil must be separate from other piping systems as far as practicable, andpositive means shall be provided to prevent interconnection in service.(2) Fuel oil and cargo oil systems may be combined if the cargo oil systemscontain only Grade E oils and have no connection to cargo systems containinggrades of oil with lower flash points or hazardous substances.(3) Pumps used to transfer oil must have no discharge connections to firemains, boiler feed systems, or condensers unless approved positive meansare provided to prevent oil from being accidentally discharged into anyof the aforementioned systems.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Filling pipes may be led directly from the deck into the tanks or toa manifold in an accessible location permanently marked to indicate thetanks to which they are connected. A shutoff valve must be fitted at eachfilling end. Oil piping must not be led through accommodation spaces, exceptthat low pressure fill piping not normally used at sea may pass throughaccommodation spaces if it is of steel construction, all welded, and notconcealed.(d) Piping subject to internal head pressure from oil in the tank mustbe fitted with positive shutoff valves located at the tank.(1) Valves installed on the outside of the oil tanks must be made of steel,ductile cast iron ASTM A395, or a ductile nonferrous alloy having a meltingpoint above 1,700 anddegrees;F and must be arranged with a means of manualcontrol locally at the valve and remotely from a readily accessible andsafe location outside of the compartment in which the valves are located.(2) If valves are installed on the inside of the tank, they may be madeof cast iron and arranged for remote control only. Additional valves forlocal control must be located in the space where the system exits fromthe tank or adjacent tanks. Valves for local control outside the tanksmust be made of steel, ductile cast iron ASTM A395, or a ductile nonferrousalloy having a melting point above 1,700 anddegrees;F. (3) Power operated valves installed to comply with the requirements ofthis section must meet the following requirements:(i) Valve actuators must be capable of closing the valves under all conditions,except during physical interruption of the power system (e.g., cable breakageor tube rupture). Fluid power actuated valves, other than those openedagainst spring pressure, must be provided with an energy storage systemwhich is protected, as far as practicable, from fire and collision. Thestorage system must be used for no other purpose and must have sufficientcapacity to cycle all connected valves from the initial valve positionto the opposite position and return. The cross connection of this systemto an alternate power supply will be given special consideration by theMarine Safety Center.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) Remote operation for shutoff valves on small independent oil tankswill be specially considered in each case where the size of tanks and theirlocation may warrant the omission of remote operating rods.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h) Oil piping must not run through feed or potable water tanks. Feed orpotable water piping must not pass through oil tanks.(i) Where flooding equalizing cross-connections between fuel or cargo tanksare required for stability considerations, the arrangement must be approvedby the Marine Safety Center.(j) Piping conveying oil must be run well away from hot surfaces whereverpossible. Where such leads are unavoidable, only welded joints are to beused, or alternatively, suitable shields are to be fitted in the way offlanged or mechanical pipe joints when welded joints are not practicale.Piping that conveys fuel oil or lubricating oil to equipment and is inthe proximity of equipment or lines having an open flame or having partsoperating above 500 anddegrees;F must be of seamless steel. (See andSection;56.50-65 of this part.)(k) Oil piping drains, strainers and other equipment subject to normaloil leakage must be fitted with drip pans or other means to prevent oildraining into the bilge.(l) Where oil piping passes through a non-oil tank and stop valves complyingwith paragraph (d) of this section are not provided at all penetrations,the piping must comply with andSection; 56.50(k) of this part.51. Section 56.50-65 is amended by revising the section heading and paragraphs(a), (b), and (d) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Burner fuel oil service systems.</ITAG>(a) All discharge piping from the fuel oil service pumps to burners mustbe seamless steel with a thickness of at least Schedule 80. If requiredby andSection; 56.07-10(e) of this part or paragraph 104.1.2 of ANSI B31.1,the thickness must be greater than Schedule 80. Short lengths of steel,or annealed copper nickel, nickel copper, or copper pipe and tubing maybe used between the fuel oil burner front header manifold and the atomizerhead to provide flexibility. All material used must meet the requirementsof subpart 56.60 of this part. The use of non-metallic materials is prohibited.The thickness of the short lengths must not be less than the larger of0.9 mm (0.35 inch) or that required by andSection; 56.07-10(e) of this part.Flexible metallic tubing for this application may be used when approvedby the Marine Safety Center. Tubing fittings must be of the flared typeexcept that flareless fittings of the nonbite type may be used when thetubing is steel, nickel copper or copper nickel.(b)(1) All vessels having oil fired boilers must have at least two fuelservice pumps, each of sufficient capacity to supply all the boilers atfull power, and arranged so that one may be overhauled while the otheris in service. At least two fuel oil heaters of approximately equal capacitymust be installed and so arranged that any heater may be overhauled whilethe other(s) is (are) in service. Suction and discharge strainers mustbe of the duplex or other type capable of being cleaned without interruptingthe oil supply.(2) All auxiliary boilers, except those furnishing steam for vital equipmentand fire extinguishing purposes other than duplicate installations, maybe equipped with a single fuel oil service pump and a single fuel oil heater.Such pumps need not be fitted with discharge strainers.(3) Strainers must be located so as to preclude the possibility of sprayingoil on the burner or boiler casing, or be provided with spray shields.Coamings, drip pans, etc., must be fitted under fuel oil service pumps,heaters, etc., where necessary to prevent oil drainage to the bilge.(4) Boilers burning fuel oils of low viscosity need not be equipped withfuel oil heaters, provided acceptable evidence is furnished to indicatethat satisfactory combustion will be obtained without the use of heaters.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) If threaded-bonnet valves are employed, they shall be of the union-bonnettype capable of being packed under pressure.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>52. Section 56.50-75 is amended by revising the last sentence in paragraph(a)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diesel fuel systems.</ITAG>(a) * * * (1) * * * Fuel oil service or unit pumps shall be equipped with controlsto comply with andSection; 58.01-25 of this subchapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>53. Section 56.50-85 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(a), removing paragraph (a)(4-a), revising paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5),redesignating existing paragraphs (a)(6) through (a)(12) as paragraphs(a)(7) through (a)(13), adding a new paragraph (a)(6), revising paragraphs(a)(8) and (a)(10), as redesignated, and adding a new paragraph (b) toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tank vent piping.</ITAG>(a) This section applies to vents for all independent, fixed, non-pressuretanks or containers or for spaces in which liquids, such as fuel, ship'sstores, cargo, or ballast, are carried.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) Tank vents must extend above the weather deck, except vents from freshwater tanks, bilge oily-water holding tanks, bilge slop tanks, and tankscontaining Grade E combustible liquids, such as lubricating oil, may terminatein the machinery space, provided_(i) The vents are arranged to prevent overflow on machinery, electricalequipment, and hot surfaces;(ii) Tanks containing combustible liquids are not heated; and(iii) The vents terminate above the deep load waterline if the tanks haveboundaries in common with the hull.(5) Vents from oil tanks must terminate not less than three feet from anyopening into living quarters.(6) Vents extending above the freeboard deck or superstructure deck fromfuel oil and other tanks must be at least Schedule 40 in wall thickness.Except for barges in inland service and for Great Lakes vessels, the heightfrom the deck to any point where water may gain access through the ventto below deck must be at least 30 inches (760mm) on the freeboard deckand 17\1/2\ inches (450mm) on the superstructure deck. On Great Lakes vessels,the height from the deck to any point where water may gain access throughthe vent to below deck must be at least 30 inches (760mm) on the freeboarddeck, 24 inches (610mm) on the raised quarterdeck, and 12 inches (305mm)on other superstructure decks. Where the height of vents on Great Lakesvessels may interfere with the working of the vessel, a lower height maybe approved by the Marine Safety Center provided the vent cap is properlyprotected from mechanical damage. For barges in inland service, the ventsmust extend at least six inches above the deck. A lesser amount may beapproved by the Marine Safety Center if evidence is provided that a particularvent has proven satisfactory in service.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(8) Vent outlets from all tanks which may emit flammable or combustiblevapors, such as bilge slop tanks and contaminated drain tanks, must befitted with a single screen of corrosion-resistant wire of at least 30by 30 mesh, or two screens of at least 20 by 20 mesh spaced not less thanone-half inch (13mm) nor more than 1\1/2\ inches (38mm) apart. The cleararea through the mesh must not be less than the internal unobstructed areaof the required pipe.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(10) The diameter of each vent pipe must not be less than 1\1/2\ inchesnominal pipe size for fresh water tanks, 2 inches nominal pipe size forwater ballast tanks, and 2\1/2\ inches nominal pipe size for fuel oil tanks,except that small independent tanks need not have a vent more than 25%greater in cross-sectional area than the fill line.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Tank vents must remain within the watertight subdivision boundariesin which the tanks they vent are located. Where the structural configurationof a vessel makes meeting this requirement impracticable, the Marine SafetyCenter may permit a tank vent to penetrate a watertight subdivision bulkhead.All tank vents which penetrate watertight subdivision bulkheads must terminateabove the weather deck.54. Section 56.50-95 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1), (b)(1),(c) and (e)(3), and adding a new paragraph (i) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Overboard discharges and shell connections.</ITAG>(a)(1) All inlets and discharges led through the vessel's side shall befitted with efficient and accessible means, located as close to the hullpenetrations as is practicable, for preventing the accidental admissionof water into the vessel either through such pipes or in the event of fractureof such pipes.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b)(1) Scuppers and discharge pipes originating at any level and pentratingthe shell either more than 17\1/2\ inches (450mm) below the freeboard deckor less than 23\1/2\ inches (600mm) above the summer load waterline mustbe provided with an automatic nonreturn valve at the shell. This valve,unless required by paragraph (b)(2) of this section, may be omitted ifthe piping is not less than Schedule 80 in wall thickness for nominal pipesizes through 8 inches, Schedule 60 for nominal pipe sizes above 8 inchesand below 16 inches, and Schedule 40 for nominal pipe sizes 16 inches andabove.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Overflow pipes which discharge through the vessel's side must be locatedas far above the deepest load line as practicable and fitted with valvesas required by paragraph (b) of this section. Two automatic nonreturn valvesmust be used unless it is impracticable to locate the inboard valve inan accessible position, in which case a nonreturn valve with a positivemeans of closure from a position above the freeboard deck will be acceptable.Overflows which extend at least 30 inches above the freeboard deck beforedischarging overboard may be fitted with a single automatic nonreturn valveat the vessel's side. Overflow pipes which serve as tank vents must notbe fitted with positive means of closure without the specific approvalof the Marine Safety Center. Overflow pipes may be vented to the weather.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) * * *(3) The thickness of inlet and discharge connections outboard of the shutoffvalves, and exclusive of seachests, must be not less than that of Schedule80 for nominal pipe sizes through 8 inches, Schedule 60 for nominal pipesizes above 8 inches and below 16 inches, and Schedule 40 for nominal pipesizes 16 inches and above.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) Except as provided for in andSection; 58.20-20(c) of this chapter, seavalves must not be held open with locks. Where it is necessary to holda discharge or intake closed with a lock, either a locking valve may belocated inboard of the sea valve, or the design must be such that thereis sufficient freedom of motion to fully close the locked sea valve afteran event, such as fire damage to the seat, causes significant leakage throughthe valve. Valves which must be opened in and emergency, such as bilgedischarges or fire pump suctions must not be locked closed, whether theyare sea valves or not.55. Section 56.50-96 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(2)(ii) and (a)(2)(iv)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-96</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Keel cooler installations.</ITAG>(a) * * *(2) * * *(ii) The flexible connections and all openings internal to the vessel,such as expansion tank vents and fills, in the installation are above thedeepest load line and all piping components are Schedule 80 or thickerbelow the deepest load line.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(iv) The forward end of the structure must be faired to the hull such thatthe horizontal length of the fairing is no less than four times the heightof the structure, or be in a protected location such as inside a bow thrustertrunk.56. Section 56.50-102 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Liquefied petroleum gas for domestic services.</ITAG>Requirements for liquefied petroleum gas systems for domestic servicesare in subpart 58.16 of this chapter.57. Section 56.50-105 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(1)(iii), revisingthe title and heading of Table 56.50-105, and adding new footnotes 3 and4 to Table 56.50-105 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.50-105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Low temperature piping.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) * * *(iii) Steels equivalent to those listed in Table 56.50-105 of this part,but not produced according to a particular ASTM specification, may be usedonly with the prior consent of the Marine Safety Center. Steels differingin chemical composition, mechanical properties or heat treatments fromthose specified may be specially approved by the Marine Safety Center.Similarly, aluminum alloys and other nonferrous materials not covered inTable 56.50-105 of this part may be specifically approved by the MarineSafety Center for service at any low temperature. There are restrictionson the use of certain materials in this part and in subchapter O of thischapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2(4,4,0),p7,8/1,s50,r50,r50,r50,r50</C><T4>Table</T4> 56.50-105_<T4>Acceptable Materials and Toughness Test Criteria \2\</T4><H1>Product form </H1><H1>ASTM specification \3\</H1><H1>Grade \4\</H1><H1>Minimum service temperature </H1><H1>Minimum avg Charpy V notch energy</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\3\ Any repair method must be acceptable to the Commandant (G-MTH),and welding repairs as well as fabrication welding must be in accordancewith part 57 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\4\ The acceptability of several alloys for low temperature serviceis not intended to suggest acceptable resistance to marine corrosion. Theselection of alloys for any particular shipboard location must take corrosionresistance into account and be approved by the Marine Safety Center.</ITAG>58. Section 56.60-1 is amended by revising the section heading and paragraphs(a)(2) and (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acceptable materials and specifications (replaces 123 and Table 126.1in ANSI B31.1).</ITAG>(a) (1) * * *(2) Materials used in piping systems must be selected from the specificationswhich appear in Table 56.60-1(a) of this section or Table 56.60-2(a) ofthis part, or they may be selected from the material specifications ofsection I, III, or VIII of the ASME Code if not prohibited by a regulationof this subchapter dealing with the particular section of the ASME Code.Table 56.60-1(a) of this section contains only pipe, tubing, and fittingspecifications. Determination of acceptability of plate, forgings, bolting,nuts, and castings may be made by reference to the ASME Code as previouslydescribed. Additionally, accepted materials for use as piping system componentsappear in Table 56.60-2(a) of this part. Materials conforming to specificationsnot described in this subparagraph must receive the specific approval ofthe Marine Safety Center before being used. Materials listed in Table 126.1of ANSI B31.1 are not accepted unless specifically permitted by this paragraph.(b) Components made in accordance with the commercial standards listedin Table 56.60-1(b) of this section and made of materials complying withparagraph (a) this section may be used in piping systems within the limitationsof the standards and within any further limitations specified in this subchapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>59. In andSection; 56.60-1, Table 56.60-1(a) is amended by revising the tableheading, the table headnote, the line entry for ``Pipe, centrifugally cast,''and note 16, removing the entries for ASTM standards A72, A155 and A445,and adding footnote 19 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,i1,s25,r25,6</C><T4>Table </T4>56.60-(a)_<T4>Adopted Specifications and Standard (Replaces Table 126.1).</T4><ITAG tagnum="96"/><T4>Note:</T4> Table 56.60-1(a) identifies the acceptable pipe, tubing,and fitting specifications intended for piping system use and replacesTable 126.1 in ANSI B31.1. Piping system applications will be consideredif certification of mechanical properties is furnished. Without this certification,use is limited to applications inside heat exchangers that insure containmentof the material inside a pressure shell.<H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="28">*     *     *     *     *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pipe, centrifugally cast:<D>(None applicable)</D><D>(\1\\9\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*     *     *     *     *</ITAG><F>\1\\6\ Copper pipe must not be used for hot oil systems except for shortflexible connections at burners. Copper pipe must be annealed before installationin Class I piping systems. See also andSection;andSection; 56.10-5(c) and 56.60-20.</F><ITAG tagnum="28">*     *     *     *     *</ITAG><F>\1\\9\ Centrifugally cast pipe must be specifically approved by theMarine Safety Center.</F></ITAG>60. In andSection; 56.60-1, Table 56.60-1(b) is amended by revising the heading,table entries, and footnote 2, removing and reserving footnote 1, ANSIstandard B2.2 and B18.2, and MSS standards SP-37, SP-42, and SP-66, andadding ANSI standards B1.20.1, B1.20.3, B16.34, B16.42, B18.2.1, B18.2.2,ASTM standards F682, F1006, F1007, F1020, F1123, F1139, F1172, F1173, F1199,F1200, and F1201, EJMA standards, MSS standard SP-83, and footnotes 3 and4 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> 56.60-1(b)_<T4>Adopted Standards Applicable to Piping Systems (Replaces Table 126.1)</T4><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>ANSI Standards</T3> (American National Standards Institute), 1430 Broadway,New York, NY 10018.<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>B1.20.1_Pipe Threads, General Purpose.B1.20.3_Dryseal Pipe Threads.<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG><T4>Table</T4> 56.60-1(b)_<T4>Adopted Standards Applicable to Piping Systems (Replaces Table 126.1)_Continued</T4>B16.1_C.I. Flanges and Fittings_Classes 125 and 250 Only.B16.3_M.I. Threaded Fittings_Classes 150 and 300.B16.4_C.I. Threaded Fittings_Classes 125 and 250.B16.5_Steel Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings.\3\B16.9_Steel Buttwelding Fittings.\3\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>B16.14_Ferrous-Threaded Plugs, Bushings and Locknuts.\4\B16.15_Cast Bronze Threaded Fittings_Classes 125 andamp; 250.\4\B16.18_Cast Brass Solder Joints.\4\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>B16.22_Wrought Copper and Bronze Solder Joint Fittings.\4\B16.23_Cast Bronze Solder-Joint Drainage Fittings.\4\B16.24_Bronze Pipe Flanges and Flanged Fittings_Class 150 and 300.\3\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>B16.28_Wrought Steel Buttwelding Short Radius Elbows and Returns.\4\B16.29_Wrought Copper and Wrought-Copper Alloy Solder Joint Drainage Fittings.\4\B16.34_Valves_Flanged, Threaded and Welding end.\3\B16.42_Ductile Iron Pipe Flanges and Fittings.\3\B18.2.1_Square and Hex Bolts and Screws, Inch series.B18.2.2_Square and Hex Nuts.<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG><R>s</R><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>ASTM Standards</T3> (American Society for Testing and Materials), 1916Race St., Philadelphia, PA 19103.<R/></ITAG>F682_Wrought Carbon Steel Sleeve-Type Couplings.F1006_Entrainment Separators for Use in Marine Piping Applications.\4\F1007_Pipe Line Expansion Joints of the Packed Slip Type for Marine Applications.F1020_Line Blind Valves for Marine Applications.\4\F1120_Circular Metallic Bellows Type Expansion Joints.F1123_Non-Metallic Expansion Joints.F1139_Steam Traps and Drains.F1172_Fuel Oil Meters of the Volumetric Positive Displacement Type.F1173_Epoxy Resin Fiberglass Pipe and Fittings to be Used for Marine Applications.F1199_Cast and Welded Pipe Line Strainers.F1200_Fabricated (Welded) Pipe Line Strainers.F1201_Fluid Conditioner Fittings in Piping Applications Above 0 anddegrees;F.<R/><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>EJMA Standards</T3> (Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association, Inc.),25 North Broadway, Tarrytown, NY 10591<R/></ITAG>Standards of the Expansion Joint Manufacturers Association, Inc.<R/><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>FCI Standards </T3>(Fluid Controls Institute, Inc.), 31 South Street,Suite 303, Morristown, NJ 07960.<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">FCI 69-1_Pressure Rating Standard for Steam Traps.\4\<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>MSS Standards </T3>(Manufacturers' Standardization Society of the Valveand Fittings Industry), 127 Park Street NE, Vienna, VA 22180.<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>SP-25_Standard Marking System for Valves, Fittings, Flanges and Unions.SP-44_Steel Pipe Line Flanges.\4\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG><T4>Table</T4> 56.60-1(b)_<T4>Adopted Standards Applicable to Piping Systems (Replaces Table 126.1)_Continued</T4>SP-51_Class 150LW Corrosion Resistant Cast Flanges and Flanged Fittings.\4\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>SP-67_Butterfly Valves.\2\ \4\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>SP-72_Ball Valves with Flanged or Butt-Welding Ends for General Service.\4\<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">*    *    *    *    *</ITAG>SP-83_Carbon Steel Pipe Unions Socket-Welding and Threaded.<F>\1\ [Removed and Reserved]</F><F>\2\ In addition, for bronze valves, adequacy of body shell thicknessshall be satisfactory to the Marine Safety Center. Refer to andSection; 56.60-10of this part for cast iron valves.</F><F>\3\ Mill or manufacturer's certification is not required, except wherea needed portion of the required marking is deleted due to size or is absentdue to age of existing stocks.</F><F>\4\ Because this standard offers the option of several materials, someof which are not generally acceptable to the Coast Guard, compliance withthe standard does not necessarily indicate compliance with these regulations.The marking on the component or the manufacturer or mill certificate mustindicate the material specification and/or grade as necessary to fullyidentify the materials used. The material used must comply with the requirementsin this subchapter relating to the particular application.</F></ITAG>61. In andSection; 56.60-2, table 56.60-2(a) is amended by revising footnotes(2), (3), (5), (9), and (14) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Limitations on materials.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\2\ Allowable stresses shall be the same as those listed in UCS23of section VIII of the ASME Code for SA-675 material of equivalent tensilestrength.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\3\ Physical testing shall be performed as for material manufacturedto ASME Specification SA-675, except that the bend test shall not be required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\5\ Limited to air and hydraulic service with a maximum design temperatureof 150 anddegrees;F. The material must not be used for salt water serviceor other fluids that may cause dezincification or stress corrosion cracking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\9\ A mercurous nitrate test, in accordance with ASTM B154, shallbe performed on a representative model for each finished product design.Tension tests shall be performed to determine tensile strength, yield strength,and elongation. Minimum values shall be those listed in table 3 of ASTMB283.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">\1\\4\ Tension tests shall be performed to determine tensile strength,yield strength, and elongation. Minimum values shall be those listed intable X-2 of ASTM B85.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>62. Section 56.60-10 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (c) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cast iron and malleable iron.</ITAG>(a) The low ductility of cast iron and malleable iron should be recognizedand the use of these metals where shock loading may occur should be avoided.Cast iron and malleable iron components shall not be used at temperaturesabove 450 anddegrees;F. Cast iron and malleable iron fittings conformingto the specifications of Table 56.60-1(a) of this part may be used at pressuresnot exceeding the limits of the applicable standards of Table 56.60-1(b)of this part at temperatures not exceeding 450 anddegrees;F. Valves of eitherof these materials may be used if they conform to the standards for class125 and class 250 flanges and flanged fittings in ANSI B16.1 and if theirservice does not exceed the rating as marked on the valve.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Malleable iron and cast iron valves and fittings, designed and markedfor Class 300 refrigeration service, may be used for such service providedthe pressure limitation of 300 pounds per square inch is not exceeded.Malleable iron flanges of this class may also be used in sizes 4 inchesand smaller (oval and square design).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>63. Section 56.60-15 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ductile iron.</ITAG>(a) Ductile cast iron components made of material conforming to ASTM A395may be used within the service restrictions and pressure-temperature limitationsof UCD-3 of section VIII of the ASME Code.(b) Ductile iron castings may be used in hydraulic systems at pressuresin excess of 1000 pounds per square inch gage, provided:(1) The castings receive a ferritizing anneal when the as-cast thicknessdoes not exceed one inch;(2) Large castings for components, such as hydraulic cylinders, are examinedas specified for a casting quality factor of 90 percent in accordance withUG-24 of section VIII of the ASME Code; and (3) The castings are not welded, brazed, plugged, or otherwise repaired.(c) After machining, ductile iron castings must be hydrostatically testedto twice their maximum allowable working pressure and must show no leaks.64. Section 56.60-20 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(4),and (b) and removing footnote 2 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonferrous materials.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) The low melting points of many nonferrous metals and alloys, such asaluminum and aluminum alloys, must be recognized. These types of heat sensitivematerials must not be used to conduct flammable, combustible, or dangerousfluids, or for vital systems unless approved by the Marine Safety Center.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>For definitions of flammable or combustible fluids, seeandSection;andSection; 30.10-15 and 30.10-22 or parts 151-154 of this chapter.Dangerous fluids are those covered by regulations in part 98 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) The corrosion resistance of copper bearing aluminum alloys in a marineatmosphere is poor and alloys with copper contents exceeding 0.6 percentshould not be used. Refer to Table 56.60-2(a) of this part for furtherguidance.(b) An additional requirement for cast aluminum alloys in hydraulic fluidpower systems is described in andSection; 58.30-15(f) of this chapter.65. Section 56.60-25 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(a), the first sentence of (a)(1)(ii), paragraphs (a)(7)(i)(A), (a)(7)(i)(B),(a)(8), (a)(10), the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1), Table 56.60-25(c),paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(5); adding new paragraphs (c)(7), (c)(8), (c)(9)and (c)(10); and, removing paragraph (e) and redesignating paragraph (f)as paragraph (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.60-25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonmetallic materials.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Plastic pipe-nonvital service. </T3>Plastic pipe may be used for nonvitalfresh and salt water service, including drains for waste and sewage servicesnot involving treatment chemicals incompatible with the pipe, or flammablevapors from degenerating waste or other sources, subject to the followinglimitations:(1) * * *(ii) An acceptable metallic shutoff valve is installed adjacent to thespool piece. * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(7) * * *(i) * * *(A) <T3>Pipe (PVC).</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D1785 (Schedule 40, 80, 120).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2241 (Standard Dimension Ratio).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2665.</ITAG>(B) <T3>Fittings (PVC).</T3><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2464 (Schedule 80 threaded).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2466 (Schedule 40 socket).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2467 (Schedule 80 socket).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D2665.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(8) In using PCV pipe, a schedule or Standard Dimension Ratio must be chosenso that the maximum value of hoop stress in service will not be more than20 percent of the specified minimum burst stress as listed in the applicablespecification. Pipe and fittings meeting ASTM D2665 are limited to drain,waste, and associated vent services.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(10) Materials, such as glass reinforced resins not meeting ASTM F1173or other plastics, may be authorized by the Commandant (G-MTH) if fullmechanical and physical properties and chemical description are furnished.Flammability of the material must be determined by the standard test methodsASTM D635 and ASTM D2863. The average extent of burning must be less than0.394 inches (10mm), the average time of burning must be less than 50 seconds,and the limiting oxygen index must be greater than 21.(b) * * *(1) Vital machinery served by plastic pipe must be duplicated by equivalentmachinery units served entirely by conventional metallic pipe, however,when such machines are in separate watertight compartments, or they arelocated or insulated such that damage to both a single localized fire isunlikely, both may be fitted with plastic   pipe. * * *(c) * * *(1) * * *<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>56.60-25(c)_<T4>Installation Requirements for Nonmetallic Flexible Hose</T4><H1>Type of service </H1><H1>Maximum service pressure (psi) </H1><H1>Type cover required </H1><H1>Required hose reinforcement </H1><H1>Where permitted</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Vital fresh and salt water <D>150 </D><D>Flame resistant \1\ </D><D>Wire or polyester </D><D>(\23\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nonvital fresh and salt water <D>150 </D><D>......do \1\ </D><D>......do </D><D>(\4\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nonvital water and pneumatic <D>50 </D><D>......do \1\ </D><D>None </D><D>(\4\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  Do <D>150 </D><D>......do \1\ </D><D>Fiber </D><D>(\4\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lube oil and fuel systems <D>  </D><D>......do \15\ </D><D>Wire </D><D>For flexibility only.\6\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fluid power systems <D>  </D><D>......do \1\ </D><D>Wire or polyester </D><D>(\7\)</D><F>\1\ The hose must be judged flame-resistant as detailed in andSection;56.60-25(c)(7) of this section.</F><F>\2\ May be used in duplicate installations in accordance with andSection;56.60-25(b) of this section for plastic pipe or in reasonable lengths whereflexibility is required at pressures not exceeding manufacturer's ratingsubject to the limitations of andSection; 56.60-25(a) (1) through (6) forplastic pipe.</F><F>\3\ Casualty control systems, such as firefighting and bilge systems,may utilize a flexibile connection only if the pump is flexibly supportedand the flexible connection is located directly at the pump.</F><F>\4\ May be used subject to the limitations of andSection;andSection; 56.60-25(a)(1) through (6) of this section for plastic pipe.</F><F>\5\ The hose assembly must be capable of withstanding the fire testdetailed in andSection; 56.60-25(c)(8) of this section.</F><F>\6\ May only be used in reasonable lengths for the purpose of flexibilityat pressures not exceeding manufacturer's rating.</F><F>\7\ See andSection; 58.30-20 of this chapter for installations permitted.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(2) Reinforced nonmetallic flexible hose must be fabricated with an innertube and a cover of synthetic rubber or other suitable material and reinforcedwith wire or polyester braid, or an even number of oppositely laid layersof closely-packed spirally wound wire.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(5) Nonmetallic hose must be complete with factory-assembled end fittingsrequiring no further adjustment of the fittings on the hose, except thatfield attachable type fittings may be used. Hose end fittings must complywith SAE J1475, (Hydraulic Hose Fittings For Marine Applications). Fieldattachable fittings must be installed following the manufacturer's recommendedpractice (method). If special equipment is required, such as crimping machines,it must be of the type and design specified by the manufacturer. A hydrostatictest of each hose assembly must be conducted in accordance with andSection;56.97-5 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(7) Nonmetallic hose must pass the flame resistance test and be markedas required by 30 CFR 18.65 of this chapter.(8) Nonmetallic hose for lube oil or fuel service must not leak duringor after a 2\1/2\ minute exposure to a N-heptane fire under the followingconditions.(i) The hose must be pressurized to the maximum allowable working pressureduring the test. (The use of water as the pressurizing medium is stronglyrecommended for safety purposes).(ii) No fluid flow may occur in the hose during the test.(iii) The hose length must be between 18 inches (46cm) and 24 inches (61cm).(iv) The hose must be positioned 9 inches (23cm) above an open pan of N-heptane.(v) At least one end fitting of the hose assembly must be engulfed in thefire.(vi) The test must be witnessed by a Coast Guard inspector or performedby an independent testing laboratory accepted by the Commandant (G-MTH).(vii) The hose must be burst at the end of the test after cool-down.(viii) The results of testing must be submitted to the Commandant (G-MTH).(9) Nonmetallic hose used in fluid power systems must be impulse testedat 125% of maximum allowable working pressure, using the fluid to be usedin service, at a temperature of 93 anddegrees;C  (200 anddegrees;F), for aminimum of 150,000 cycles in accordance with the test method in SAE J343,Tests and Procedures for SAE 100R Series Hydraulic Hose and Hose Assemblies.If acceptance for higher temperature service is desired, the test mustbe performed at the higher temperature.(10) After hose assemblies have been impulse tested, fire tested, or testedfor flame resistance, duplicate hose assemblies of the same materials,design, construction and size need not be so tested, but must be givena hydrostatic test as required in paragraph (c)(5) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>66. Section 56.70-1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.70-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) The following generally applies to all types of welding, such as studwelding, casting repair welding and all processes of fabrication welding.Where the detailed requirements are not appropriate to a particular process,alternatives must be approved by the Marine Safety Center.67. Section 56.70-10 is amended by revising the heading and paragraph (b)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.70-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Preparation (modifies 127.3).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Fillet welds (modifies 127.3.2). </T3>In making fillet welds, the weldmetal must be deposited in such a way as to obtain adequate penetrationinto the base metal at the root of the weld. Piping components which areto be joined utilizing fillet welds must be prepared in accordance withapplicable provisions and requirements of this section. For typical details,see Figures 127.4.4A and 127.4.4C of ANSI B31.1 and Figure 56.30-10(b)of this part. See andSection; 56.30-5(d) of this part for additional requirements.68. Section 56.70-15 is amended by revising paragraphs (b)(2), the headingof (b)(5), (b)(7), the first sentence of paragraph (c) and (d), removingdetail A from Figure 56.70-15(g) and redesignating the remaining details``A'' through ``E'', and revising the heading of Table 56.70-15 to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.70-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) Girth butt welds in Class I, I-L, and II-L piping systems shall bedouble welded butt joints or equivalent single welded butt joints for pipediameters exceeding three-fourth inch nominal pipe size. The use of a singlewelded butt joint employing a backing ring (note restrictions in paragraph(b)(3)(iv) of this section) on the inside of the pipe is an acceptableequivalent for Class I and Class II-L applications, but not permitted forClass I-L applications. Single welded butt joints employing either an inertgas for first pass backup or a consumable insert ring may be consideredthe equivalent of a double welded butt joint for all classes of pipingand is preferable for Class I-L and II-L systems where double butt weldscannot be used. Appropriate welding procedure qualification tests shallbe conducted as specified in part 57 of this subchapter. A first pass inertgas backup is intended to mean that the inside of the pipe is purged withinert gas and that the root is welded with the inert gas metal arc (mig)or inert gas tungsten arc (tig) processes. Classes I, I-L, and II-L pipingare required to have the inside of the pipe machined for good fit up ifthe misalignment exceeds that specified in andSection; 56.70-10(a)(3). Inthe case of Class II piping the machining of the inside of the pipe maybe omitted. For single welded joints, where possible, the inside of thejoint shall be examined visually to assure full penetration. Radiographicexamination of at least 20 percent of single welded joints to check forpenetration is required for all Class I and Class I-L systems regardlessof size following the requirements of andSection; 56.95-10. Ultrasonic testingmay be utilized in lieu of radiographic examination if the procedures areapproved.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(5) (Reproduces 127.2(c)). * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(7) The type and extent of examination required for girth butt welds isspecified in andSection; 56.95-10.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Longitudinal butt welds. </T3>Longitudinal butt welds in piping componentsnot made in accordance with the standards and specifications listed in56.60-1 (a) and (b) must meet the requirements of paragraph 104.7 of ANSI-B31.1and may be examined nondestructively by an acceptable method. * * *(d) <T3>Fillet welds. </T3>(1) Fillet welds may vary from convex to concave.The size of a fillet weld is determined as shown in Figure 127.4.4A inANSI B31.1. Fillet weld details for socket-welding components must meetandSection; 56.30-5(c) of this part. Fillet weld details for flanges mustmeet andSection; 56.30-10(c) of this part. Fillet weld details for flangesmust meet andSection; 56.30-10 of this part.(2) The limitations on cracks and undercutting set forth in paragraph (b)(8)of this section for girth welds are also applicable to fillet welds.(3) Class I piping not exceeding 3 inches nominal pipe size and not subjectto full radiography by andSection; 56.95-10 of this part may be joined bysleeves fitted over pipe ends or by socket type joints. Where full radiographyis required, only butt type joints may be used. The inside diameter ofthe sleeve must not exceed the outside diameter of the pipe or tube bymore than 0.080 inch. Fit between socket and pipe must conform to applicablestandards for socket weld fittings. Depth of insertion of pipe or tubewithin the socket or sleeve must not be less than three-eighths inch. Thefillet weld must be deposited in a minimum of two passes, unless specificallyapproved otherwise in a special procedure qualification. Requirements forjoints employing socket weld and slip-on flanges are in andSection; 56.30-10of this part.(4) Sleeve and socket type joints may be used in Class II piping systemswithout restriction as to size of pipe or tubing joined. Applicable standardsmust be followed on fit. The fillet welds must be deposited in a minimumof two passes, unless specifically approved otherwise in a special procedurequalification. Requirements for joints employing socket weld and slip-onflanges are in andSection; 56.30-10 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>56.70-15 <T4>Reinforcement of Girth and Longitudinal Butt Welds</T4><H1>Thickness (in inches) of base metal</H1><H1>Maximum thickness (in inches of reinforcement for design temperature</H1><H2>Below 0 anddegrees;F or above 750 anddegrees;F</H2><H2>350anddegrees; to 750 anddegrees;F</H2><H2>0 anddegrees;F and above but less than 350 anddegrees;F</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>69. Section 56.75-5 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.75-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filler metal.</ITAG>(a) The filler metal used in brazing must be a nonferrous metal or alloyhaving a melting point above 1,000 anddegrees;F. and below that of the metalbeing joined. The filler metal must meet and flow freely within the desiredtemperature range and, in conjunction with a suitable flux or controlledatmosphere, must wet and adhere to the surfaces to be joined. Prior tousing a particular brazing material in a piping system, the requirementsof andSection; 56.60-20 of this part should be considered.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.85-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>70. In andSection; 56.85-10, Table 56.85-10 is amended by removing the word``minimum'' wherever it appears in the column under the heading ``MinimumTemperature'', and adding the word ``inclusive'' after the words ``up to\3/4\ in.'' in the ``Minimum Wall'' column opposite ``P-5(15) (less than5 cr.)''.71. Section 56.95-10 is amended by removing Table 56.95-10 and revisingparagraphs (a) and (c)(2) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.95-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Type and extent of examination required.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The types and extent of nondestructive examinations requiredfor piping must be in accordance with this section and Table 136.4 of ANSI-B31.1.In addition, a visual examination shall be made.(1) 100 percent radiography \1\ is required for all Class I, I-L and II-Lpiping equal to or greater than 4 inches nominal diameter or 0.375 inchesnominal wall thickness.(2) Nondestructive examination is required for all Class II piping equalto or greater than 18 inches nominal diameter regardless or wall thickness.Any test method acceptable to the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspectionmay be used.(3) Appropriate nondestructive examinations of other piping systems arerequired only when deemed necessary by the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection.In such cases a method of testing satisfactory to the Officer in Charge,Marine Inspection must be selected from those described in this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(2) <T3>Random radiography. </T3>Where random radiography \1\ is required,one or more welds may be completely or partially radiographed. Random radiographyis considered to be a desirable means of spot checking welder performance,particularly in field welding where conditions such as position, ambienttemperatures, and cleanliness are not as readily controlled as in shopwelding. It is to be employed whenever an Officer in Charge, Marine Inspectionquestions a pipe weld not otherwise required to be tested. The standardsof acceptance are the same as for 100 percent radiography.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>72. Section 56.97-5 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 56.97-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pressure testing of nonstandard piping system components.</ITAG>(a) All nonstandard piping system components such as welded valves andfittings, nonstandard fittings, manifolds, seacocks, and other appurtenancesmust be hydrostatically tested to twice the rated pressure stamped thereon,except that no component should be tested at a pressure causing stressesin excess of 90 percent of its yield strength.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 61_PERIODIC TESTS AND INSPECTIONS [AMENDED]</ITAG>73. The authority citation for Part 61 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>43 U.S.C. 1333; 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; E.O. 12234, 45FR 58801, 3 CFR, 1980 Comp., p. 227; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>74. Subpart 61.15 is amended by adding a new andSection; 61.15-2 to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.15-12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonmetallic expansion joints.</ITAG>(a) Nonmetallic expansion joints must be examined externally at each inspectionfor certification for signs of excessive wear, fatigue, deterioration,physical damage, misalignment, improper flange-to-flange spacing, and leakage.A complete internal examination must be conducted when an external examinationreveals excessive wear or other signs of deterioration or damage.(b) A nonmetallic expansion joint must be replaced ten years after itsdate of manufacture if it is located in a system which penetrates the vessel'sside and both the penetration and the nonmetallic expansion joint are locatedbelow the deepest load waterline. The Officer in Charge, Marine Inspectionmay grant an extension of the ten year replacement to coincide with thevessel's next drydocking.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 3, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">J. D. Sipes,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Rear Admiral, U.S. Coast Guard, Chief, Office of Marine Safety, Securityand Environmental Protection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-22978 Filed 9-29-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>